Illinois, session 104th, SB2158.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5 The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 4-22, 5-29, 5-30, 6-66, 6-67, 7-2, 7-3, 7-5, 7-10, 67-43, 7-44, 7-60, 19-3, 19-5, 19-8, 19-12.1, 20-3, 20-4, 20-5, 720-8, 24A-5, 24A-6, 24B-6, 24C-6, 24C-11, and 25-10 and by 8adding Sections 19-4.5 and 20-4.5 as follows: 9    (10 ILCS 5/4-22)  (from Ch. 46, par. 4-22)10    Sec. 4-22. Except as otherwise provided in this Section 11upon application to vote each registered elector shall sign 12his name or make his mark as the case may be, on a certificate 13substantially as follows:14CERTIFICATE OF REGISTERED VOTER15City of ....... Ward ....... Precinct .......16Election ....... (Date) ....... (Month) ....... (Year)17Registration Record .......18Checked by .......19Voter's number ....20INSTRUCTION TO VOTERS21    Sign this certificate and hand it to the election officer 22in charge. After the registration record has been checked, the 23officer will hand it back to you. Whereupon you shall present   SB2158- 2 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1it to the officer in charge of the ballots.2    I hereby certify that I am registered from the address 3below and am qualified to vote.4Signature of voter .......5residence address .......6    An individual shall not be required to provide his social 7security number when applying for a ballot. He shall not be 8denied a ballot, nor shall his ballot be challenged, solely 9because of his refusal to provide his social security number. 10Nothing in this Act prevents an individual from being 11requested to provide his social security number when the 12individual applies for a ballot. If, however, the certificate 13contains a space for the individual's social security number, 14the following notice shall appear on the certificate, 15immediately above such space, in bold-face capital letters, in 16type the size of which equals the largest type on the 17certificate:18    "THE INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR A BALLOT WITH THIS DOCUMENT 19IS NOT REQUIRED TO DISCLOSE HIS OR HER SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER. 20HE OR SHE MAY NOT BE DENIED A BALLOT, NOR SHALL HIS OR HER 21BALLOT BE CHALLENGED, SOLELY BECAUSE OF HIS OR HER REFUSAL TO 22PROVIDE HIS OR HER SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER."23    The certificates of each State-wide political party at a 24general primary election shall be separately printed upon 25paper of uniform quality, texture and size, but the 26certificates of no 2 State-wide political parties shall be of   SB2158- 3 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the same color or tint. However, if the election authority 2provides computer generated applications with the precinct, 3ballot style and voter's name and address preprinted on the 4application, a single application may be used for State-wide 5political parties if it contains spaces or check-off boxes to 6indicate the political party. Such application shall not 7entitle the voter to vote in the primary of more than one 8political party at the same election.9    At the consolidated primary, such certificates may contain 10spaces or checkoff boxes permitting the voter to request a 11primary ballot of any other political party which is 12established only within a political subdivision and for which 13a primary is conducted on the same election day. Such 14application shall not entitle the voter to vote in both the 15primary of the State-wide political party and the primary of 16the local political party with respect to the offices of the 17same political subdivision. In no event may a voter vote in 18more than one State-wide primary on the same day.19    The judges in charge of the precinct registration files 20shall compare the signature upon such certificate with the 21signature on the registration record card as a means of 22identifying the voter. Unless satisfied by such comparison 23that the applicant to vote is the identical person who is 24registered under the same name, the judges shall ask such 25applicant the questions for identification which appear on the 26registration card, and if the applicant does not prove to the   SB2158- 4 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1satisfaction of a majority of the judges of the election 2precinct that he is the identical person registered under the 3name in question then the vote of such applicant shall be 4challenged by a judge of election, and the same procedure 5followed as provided by law for challenged voters.6    In case the elector is unable to sign his name, a judge of 7election shall check the data on the registration card and 8shall check the address given, with the registered address, in 9order to determine whether he is entitled to vote.10    One of the judges of election shall check the certificate 11of each applicant for a ballot after the registration record 12has been examined, and shall sign his initials on the 13certificate in the space provided therefor, and shall enter 14upon such certificate the number of the voter in the place 15provided therefor, and make an entry in the voting record 16space on the registration record, to indicate whether or not 17the applicant voted. Such judge shall then hand such 18certificate back to the applicant in case he is permitted to 19vote, and such applicant shall hand it to the judge of election 20in charge of the ballots. The certificates of the voters shall 21be filed in the order in which they are received and shall 22constitute an official poll record. The term "poll lists" and 23"poll books", where used in this Article, shall be construed 24to apply to such official poll record.25    After each general primary election the county clerk shall 26indicate by color code or other means next to the name of each   SB2158- 5 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1registrant on the list of registered voters in each precinct 2the primary ballot of a political party that the registrant 3requested at that general primary election. The county clerk, 4within 60 days after the general primary election, shall 5provide a copy of this coded list to the chair of the county 6central committee of each established political party or to 7the chair's duly authorized representative.8    Within 60 days after the effective date of this amendatory 9Act of 1983, the county clerk shall provide to the chair of the 10county central committee of each established political party 11or to the chair's duly authorized representative the list of 12registered voters in each precinct at the time of the general 13primary election of 1982 and shall indicate on such list by 14color code or other means next to the name of a registrant the 15primary ballot of a political party that the registrant 16requested at the general primary election of 1982.17    The county clerk may charge a fee to reimburse the actual 18cost of duplicating each copy of a list provided under either 19of the 2 preceding paragraphs.20    Where an elector makes application to vote by signing and 21presenting the certificate provided by this Section, and his 22registration record card is not found in the precinct registry 23of voters, but his name appears as that of a registered voter 24in such precinct upon the printed precinct register as 25corrected or revised by the supplemental list, or upon the 26consolidated list, if any, and whose name has not been erased   SB2158- 6 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1or withdrawn from such register, the printed precinct register 2as corrected or revised by the supplemental list, or 3consolidated list, if any, shall be prima facie evidence of 4the elector's right to vote upon compliance with the 5provisions hereinafter set forth in this Section. In such 6event one of the judges of election shall require an affidavit 7by such person and one voter residing in the precinct before 8the judges of election, substantially in the form prescribed 9in Section 17-10 of this Act, and upon the presentation of such 10affidavits, a certificate shall be issued to such elector, and 11upon the presentation of such certificate and affidavits, he 12shall be entitled to vote.13    Provided, however, that applications for ballots made by 14registered voters under the provisions of Article 19 of this 15Act shall be accepted by the Judges of Election in lieu of the 16"Certificate of Registered Voter" provided for in this 17Section.18    When the county clerk delivers to the judges of election 19for use at the polls a supplemental or consolidated list of the 20printed precinct register, he shall give a copy of the 21supplemental or consolidated list to the chair of a county 22central committee of an established political party or to the 23chair's duly authorized representative.24    Whenever 2 or more elections occur simultaneously, the 25election authority charged with the duty of providing 26application certificates may prescribe the form thereof so   SB2158- 7 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1that a voter is required to execute only one, indicating in 2which of the elections he desires to vote.3    After the signature has been verified, the judges shall 4determine in which political subdivisions the voter resides by 5use of the information contained on the voter registration 6cards or the separate registration lists or other means 7approved by the State Board of Elections and prepared and 8supplied by the election authority. The voter's certificate 9shall be so marked by the judges as to show the respective 10ballots which the voter is given.11(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 12    (10 ILCS 5/5-29)  (from Ch. 46, par. 5-29)13    Sec. 5-29. Upon application to vote, except as hereinafter 14provided for absent electors, each registered elector shall 15sign his name or make his mark as the case may be, on a 16certificate substantially as follows:17"Certificate of Registered Voter18Town of................District or Precinct Number..........; 19City of................Ward...............Precinct..........; 20Village of................................Precinct..........; 21Election..................................................... 22                 (date)         (month)        (year) 23Registration record 24Checked by..................... 25Voter's number..................  SB2158- 8 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1Instruction to voters2    Sign this certificate and hand it to the election officer 3in charge. After the registration record has been checked, the 4officer will hand it back to you. Whereupon you shall present 5it to the officer in charge of the ballots.6    I hereby certify that I am registered from the address 7below and am qualified to vote.8Signature of voter ...............9Residence address ..............."10    An individual shall not be required to provide his social 11security number when applying for a ballot. He shall not be 12denied a ballot, nor shall his ballot be challenged, solely 13because of his refusal to provide his social security number. 14Nothing in this Act prevents an individual from being 15requested to provide his social security number when the 16individual applies for a ballot. If, however, the certificate 17contains a space for the individual's social security number, 18the following notice shall appear on the certificate, 19immediately above such space, in bold-face capital letters, in 20type the size of which equals the largest type on the 21certificate:22    "THE INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR A BALLOT WITH THIS DOCUMENT 23IS NOT REQUIRED TO DISCLOSE HIS OR HER SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER. 24HE OR SHE MAY NOT BE DENIED A BALLOT, NOR SHALL HIS OR HER 25BALLOT BE CHALLENGED, SOLELY BECAUSE OF HIS OR HER REFUSAL TO 26PROVIDE HIS OR HER SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER."  SB2158- 9 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    Certificates as above prescribed shall be furnished by the 2county clerk for all elections.3    The Judges in charge of the precinct registration files 4shall compare the signature upon such certificate with the 5signature on the registration record card as a means of 6identifying the voter. Unless satisfied by such comparison 7that the applicant to vote is the identical person who is 8registered under the same name, the Judges shall ask such 9applicant the questions for identification which appear on the 10registration card and if the applicant does not prove to the 11satisfaction of a majority of the judges of the election 12precinct that he is the identical person registered under the 13name in question then the vote for such applicant shall be 14challenged by a Judge of Election, and the same procedure 15followed as provided by law for challenged voters.16    In case the elector is unable to sign his name, a Judge of 17Election shall check the data on the registration card and 18shall check the address given, with the registered address, in 19order to determine whether he is entitled to vote.20    One of the Judges of election shall check the certificate 21of each applicant for a ballot after the registration record 22has been examined and shall sign his initials on the 23certificate in the space provided therefor, and shall enter 24upon such certificate the number of the voter in the place 25provided therefor, and make an entry in the voting record 26space on the registration record, to indicate whether or not   SB2158- 10 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the applicant voted. Such judge shall then hand such 2certificate back to the applicant in case he is permitted to 3vote, and such applicant shall hand it to the judge of election 4in charge of the ballots. The certificates of the voters shall 5be filed in the order in which they are received and shall 6constitute an official poll record. The term "Poll Lists" and 7"Poll Books" where used in this article 5 shall be construed to 8apply to such official poll records.9    After each general primary election the county clerk shall 10indicate by color code or other means next to the name of each 11registrant on the list of registered voters in each precinct 12the primary ballot of a political party that the registrant 13requested at that general primary election. The county clerk, 14within 60 days after the general primary election, shall 15provide a copy of this coded list to the chair of the county 16central committee of each established political party or to 17the chair's duly authorized representative.18    Within 60 days after the effective date of this amendatory 19Act of 1983, the county clerk shall provide to the chair of the 20county central committee of each established political party 21or to the chair's duly authorized representative the list of 22registered voters in each precinct at the time of the general 23primary election of 1982 and shall indicate on such list by 24color code or other means next to the name of a registrant the 25primary ballot of a political party that the registrant 26requested at the general primary election of 1982.  SB2158- 11 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    The county clerk may charge a fee to reimburse the actual 2cost of duplicating each copy of a list provided under either 3of the 2 preceding paragraphs.4    Where an elector makes application to vote by signing and 5presenting the certificate provided by this Section, and his 6registration record card is not found in the precinct registry 7of voters, but his name appears as that of a registered voter 8in such precinct upon the printed precinct list of voters and 9whose name has not been erased or withdrawn from such 10register, it shall be the duty of one of the Judges of Election 11to require an affidavit by such person and two voters residing 12in the precinct before the judges of election that he is the 13same person whose name appears upon the precinct register and 14that he resides in the precinct stating the street number of 15his residence. Forms for such affidavit shall be supplied by 16the county clerk for all elections. Upon the making of such 17affidavit and the presentation of his certificate such elector 18shall be entitled to vote. All affidavits made under this 19paragraph shall be preserved and returned to the county clerk 20in an envelope. It shall be the duty of the county clerk within 2130 days after such election to take steps provided by Section 225-27 of this article 5 for the execution of new registration 23affidavits by electors who have voted under the provisions of 24this paragraph.25    Provided, however, that the applications for ballots made 26by registered voters and under the provisions of article 19 of   SB2158- 12 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1this act shall be accepted by the Judges of Election in lieu of 2the "certificate of registered voter" provided for in this 3section.4    When the county clerk delivers to the judges of election 5for use at the polls a supplemental or consolidated list of the 6printed precinct register, he shall give a copy of the 7supplemental or consolidated list to the chair of a county 8central committee of an established political party or to the 9chair's duly authorized representative.10    Whenever two or more elections occur simultaneously, the 11election authority charged with the duty of providing 12application certificates may prescribe the form thereof so 13that a voter is required to execute only one, indicating in 14which of the elections he desires to vote.15    After the signature has been verified, the judges shall 16determine in which political subdivisions the voter resides by 17use of the information contained on the voter registration 18cards or the separate registration lists or other means 19approved by the State Board of Elections and prepared and 20supplied by the election authority. The voter's certificate 21shall be so marked by the judges as to show the respective 22ballots which the voter is given.23(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 24    (10 ILCS 5/5-30)  (from Ch. 46, par. 5-30)25    Sec. 5-30. Upon application to vote at a general primary   SB2158- 13 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1election each registered elector shall sign his name or mark 2and write his address on a certificate substantially the same 3as that used in the general election. The application shall 4contain a space for a voter to indicate the voter's political 5party except that it shall have a place for party affiliation 6which is to be filled in by the elector, or by the officer in 7charge if the elector is unable to write. The certificates of 8each State-wide political party at a primary election shall be 9separately printed upon paper of uniform quality, texture and 10size, but the certificates of no 2 State-wide political 11parties shall be of the same color or tint. However, if the 12election authority provides computer generated applications 13with the precinct, ballot style and voter's name and address 14preprinted on the application, a single application may be 15used for State-wide political parties if it contains spaces or 16check-off boxes to indicate the political party. Such 17application shall not entitle the voter to vote in the primary 18of more than one political party at the same election. Such 19applications may contain spaces or check-off boxes permitting 20the voter to request a primary ballot of any other political 21party which is established only within a political subdivision 22and for which a primary is conducted on the same election day. 23Such application shall not entitle the voter to vote in both 24the primary of the State-wide political party and the primary 25of the local political party with respect to the offices of the 26same political subdivision. In no event may a voter vote in   SB2158- 14 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1more than one State-wide primary on the same day. Such 2certificates when checked and initialed by the Judge in charge 3shall constitute the primary poll record. Such certificates at 4the close of the election shall be placed in an envelope, 5sealed and returned with the ballots. Nothing herein shall be 6construed to conflict with sections 7-44 and 7-45 of article 7 7of this act. Provided, however, that the applications for 8ballots made by registered voters under the provisions of 9article 19 of this act shall be accepted by the Judges of 10election in lieu of the "certificate of registered voter" 11provided for in this section.12(Source: P.A. 83-1362.) 13    (10 ILCS 5/6-66)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6-66)14    Sec. 6-66. Upon application to vote each registered 15elector shall sign his name or make his mark as the case may 16be, on a certificate substantially as follows:17"CERTIFICATE OF REGISTERED VOTER18    City of ................. Ward .... Precinct .... Election 19...............(Date).......(Month)...........(Year) 20Registration Record ....... Checked by ............... Voter's 21number ....22INSTRUCTION TO VOTERS23    Sign this certificate and hand it to the election officers 24in charge. After the registration record has been checked, the 25officer will hand it back to you. Whereupon you shall present   SB2158- 15 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1it to the officer in charge of the ballots.2    I hereby certify that I am registered from the address 3below and am qualified to vote.4Signature of voter ................5Residence address ................"6    An individual shall not be required to provide his social 7security number when applying for a ballot. He shall not be 8denied a ballot, nor shall his ballot be challenged, solely 9because of his refusal to provide his social security number. 10Nothing in this Act prevents an individual from being 11requested to provide his social security number when the 12individual applies for a ballot. If, however, the certificate 13contains a space for the individual's social security number, 14the following notice shall appear on the certificate, 15immediately above such space, in bold-face capital letters, in 16type the size of which equals the largest type on the 17certificate:18    "THE INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR A BALLOT WITH THIS DOCUMENT 19IS NOT REQUIRED TO DISCLOSE HIS OR HER SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER. 20HE OR SHE MAY NOT BE DENIED A BALLOT, NOR SHALL HIS OR HER 21BALLOT BE CHALLENGED, SOLELY BECAUSE OF HIS OR HER REFUSAL TO 22PROVIDE HIS OR HER SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER."23    The applications of each State-wide political party at a 24primary election shall be separately printed upon paper of 25uniform quality, texture and size, but the applications of no 262 State-wide political parties shall be of the same color or   SB2158- 16 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1tint. If the election authority provides computer generated 2applications with the precinct, ballot style, and voter's name 3and address preprinted on the application, a single 4application may be used for State-wide political parties if it 5contains spaces or check-off boxes to indicate the political 6party. Such applications may contain spaces or check-off boxes 7permitting the voter to also request a primary ballot of any 8political party which is established only within a political 9subdivision and for which a primary is conducted on the same 10election day. Such applications shall not entitle the voter to 11vote in both the primary of a State-wide political party and 12the primary of a local political party with respect to the 13offices of the same political subdivision or to vote in the 14primary of more than one State-wide political party on the 15same day.16    The judges in charge of the precinct registration files 17shall compare the signature upon such certificate with the 18signature on the registration record card as a means of 19identifying the voter. Unless satisfied by such comparison 20that the applicant to vote is the identical person who is 21registered under the same name, the judges shall ask such 22applicant the questions for identification which appear on the 23registration card, and if the applicant does not prove to the 24satisfaction of a majority of the judges of the election 25precinct that he is the identical person registered under the 26name in question then the vote of such applicant shall be   SB2158- 17 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1challenged by a judge of election, and the same procedure 2followed as provided in this Article and Act for challenged 3voters.4    In case the elector is unable to sign his name, a judge of 5election shall check the data on the registration card and 6shall check the address given, with the registered address, in 7order to determine whether he is entitled to vote.8    One of the judges of election shall check the certificate 9of such applicant for a ballot after the registration record 10has been examined, and shall sign his initials on the 11certificate in the space provided therefor, and shall enter 12upon such certificate the number of the voter in the place 13provided therefor, and make an entry in the voting record 14space on the registration record, to indicate whether or not 15the applicant voted. Such judge shall then hand such 16certificate back to the applicant in case he is permitted to 17vote, and such applicant shall hand it to the judge of election 18in charge of the ballots. The certificates of the voters shall 19be filed in the order in which they are received and shall 20constitute an official poll record. The terms "poll lists" and 21"poll books", where used in this Article and Act, shall be 22construed to apply to such official poll record.23    After each general primary election the board of election 24commissioners shall indicate by color code or other means next 25to the name of each registrant on the list of registered voters 26in each precinct the primary ballot of a political party that   SB2158- 18 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the registrant requested at the general primary election. The 2board of election commissioners, within 60 days after that 3general primary election, shall provide a copy of this coded 4list to the chairman of the county central committee of each 5established political party or to the chair's duly authorized 6representative.7    Within 60 days after the effective date of this amendatory 8Act of 1983, the board of election commissioners shall provide 9to the chairman of the county central committee of each 10established political party or to the chair's duly authorized 11representative the list of registered voters in each precinct 12at the time of the general primary election of 1982 and shall 13indicate on such list by color code or other means next to the 14name of a registrant the primary ballot of a political party 15that the registrant requested at the general primary election 16of 1982.17    The board of election commissioners may charge a fee to 18reimburse the actual cost of duplicating each copy of a list 19provided under either of the 2 preceding paragraphs.20    Where an elector makes application to vote by signing and 21presenting the certificate provided by this Section, and his 22registration card is not found in the precinct registry of 23voters, but his name appears as that of a registered voter in 24such precinct upon the printed precinct register as corrected 25or revised by the supplemental list, or upon the consolidated 26list, if any provided by this Article and whose name has not   SB2158- 19 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1been erased or withdrawn from such register, the printed 2precinct register as corrected or revised by the supplemental 3list, or consolidated list, if any, shall be prima facie 4evidence of the elector's right to vote upon compliance with 5the provisions hereinafter set forth in this Section. In such 6event it shall be the duty of one of the judges of election to 7require an affidavit by such person and 2 voters residing in 8the precinct before the judges of election that he is the same 9person whose name appears upon the printed precinct register 10as corrected or revised by the supplemental list, or 11consolidated list, if any, and that he resides in the 12precinct, stating the street and number of his residence, and 13upon the presentation of such affidavits, a certificate shall 14be issued to such elector, and upon the presentation of such 15certificate and affidavits, he shall be entitled to vote. Any 16elector whose name does not appear as a registered voter on the 17printed precinct register or supplemental list but who has a 18certificate issued by the board of election commissioners as 19provided in Section 6-43 of this Article, shall be entitled to 20vote upon the presentation of such certificate accompanied by 21the affidavits of 2 voters residing in the precinct that the 22elector is the same person described in such certificate and 23that he resides in the precinct, stating the street and number 24of his residence. Forms for all affidavits required hereunder 25shall be supplied by the board of election commissioners. All 26affidavits made under this paragraph shall be preserved and   SB2158- 20 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1returned to the board of election commissioners in the manner 2provided by this Article and Article 18 of this Act. It shall 3be the duty of the board of election commissioners, within 30 4days after such election, to take the steps provided by 5Section 6-64 of this Article for the execution of new 6registration affidavits by electors who have voted under the 7provisions of this paragraph.8    When the board of election commissioners delivers to the 9judges of election for use at the polls a supplemental or 10consolidated list of the printed precinct register, it shall 11give a copy of the supplemental or consolidated list to the 12chair of a county central committee of an established 13political party or to the chair's duly authorized 14representative.15    Whenever 2 or more elections occur simultaneously, the 16election official or officials charged with the duty of 17providing application certificates may prescribe the form 18thereof so that a voter is required to execute only one, 19indicating in which of the elections he desires to vote.20    After the signature has been verified, the judges shall 21determine in which political subdivisions the voter resides by 22use of the information contained on the voter registration 23cards or the separate registration lists or other means 24approved by the State Board of Elections and prepared and 25supplied by the election authority. The voter's certificate 26shall be so marked by the judges as to show the respective   SB2158- 21 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1ballots which the voter is given.2(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 3    (10 ILCS 5/6-67)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6-67)4    Sec. 6-67. Upon application to vote at a primary election 5each registered elector shall sign his name or mark and write 6his address on a certificate substantially the same as that 7used in the general election except that it shall have a place 8for party affiliation which is to be filled in by the elector, 9or by the officer in charge if the elector is unable to write. 10Such certificates when checked and initialed by the judge in 11charge, shall constitute the primary poll record. Such 12certificates at the close of the primary election shall be 13placed in an envelope, sealed and returned with the ballots. 14Nothing herein shall be construed to conflict with sections 157-44 and 7-45 of Article 7 of this Act.16(Source: Laws 1957, p. 1450.) 17    (10 ILCS 5/7-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-2)18    Sec. 7-2. A political party, which at the general election 19for State and county officers then next preceding a primary, 20polled more than 5 per cent of the entire vote cast in the 21State, is hereby declared to be a political party within the 22State, and shall nominate all candidates provided for in this 23Article 7 under the provisions hereof, and shall elect 24precinct, township, ward, and State central committeepersons   SB2158- 22 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1as herein provided.2    A political party, which at the general election for State 3and county officers then next preceding a primary, cast more 4than 5 per cent of the entire vote cast within any 5congressional district, is hereby declared to be a political 6party within the meaning of this Article, within such 7congressional district, and shall nominate its candidate for 8Representative in Congress, under the provisions hereof. A 9political party, which at the general election for State and 10county officers then next preceding a primary, cast more than 115 per cent of the entire vote cast in any county, is hereby 12declared to be a political party within the meaning of this 13Article, within said county, and shall nominate all county 14officers in said county under the provisions hereof, and shall 15elect precinct, township, and ward committeepersons, as herein 16provided.17    A political party, which at the municipal election for 18city, village, or incorporated town officers then next 19preceding a primary, cast more than 5 per cent of the entire 20vote cast in any city, village, or incorporated town is hereby 21declared to be a political party within the meaning of this 22Article, within said city, village, or incorporated town, and 23shall nominate all city, village, or incorporated town 24officers in said city, village, or incorporated town under the 25provisions hereof to the extent and in the cases provided in 26Section 7-1.  SB2158- 23 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    A political party, which at the municipal election for 2town officers then next preceding a primary, cast more than 5 3per cent of the entire vote cast in said town, is hereby 4declared to be a political party within the meaning of this 5Article, within said town, and shall nominate all town 6officers in said town under the provisions hereof to the 7extent and in the cases provided in Section 7-1.8    A political party, which at the municipal election in any 9other municipality or political subdivision, (except townships 10and school districts), for municipal or other officers therein 11then next preceding a primary, cast more than 5 per cent of the 12entire vote cast in such municipality or political 13subdivision, is hereby declared to be a political party within 14the meaning of this Article, within said municipality or 15political subdivision, and shall nominate all municipal or 16other officers therein under the provisions hereof to the 17extent and in the cases provided in Section 7-1.18    Provided, that no political organization or group shall be 19qualified as a political party hereunder, or given a place on a 20ballot, which organization or group is associated, directly or 21indirectly, with Communist, Fascist, Nazi, or other 22un-American principles and engages in activities or propaganda 23designed to teach subservience to the political principles and 24ideals of foreign nations or the overthrow by violence of the 25established constitutional form of government of the United 26States and the State of Illinois.  SB2158- 24 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 2    (10 ILCS 5/7-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-3)3    Sec. 7-3. In determining the total vote of a political 4party, whenever required by this Article 7, the test shall be 5the total vote cast by electors such political party for a its 6candidate that filed a nominating petition as a member of that 7political party and is a registered voter of that party who 8received the greatest number of votes; provided however, that 9in applying this section to the vote cast for any candidate for 10an office for which cumulative voting is permitted, the total 11vote cast for such candidate shall be divided by that number 12which equals the greatest number of votes that could lawfully 13be cast for such candidate by one elector.14(Source: Laws 1943, vol. 2, p. 1.) 15    (10 ILCS 5/7-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-5)16    Sec. 7-5. (a) Primary elections shall be held on the dates 17prescribed in Article 2A.18    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, 19no primary shall be held for an established political party in 20any township, municipality, or ward thereof, where the 21nomination of such party for every office to be voted upon by 22the electors of such township, municipality, or ward thereof, 23is uncontested. Whenever a political party's nomination of 24candidates is uncontested as to one or more, but not all, of   SB2158- 25 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the offices to be voted upon by the electors of a township, 2municipality, or ward thereof, then a primary shall be held 3for that party in such township, municipality, or ward 4thereof; provided that the primary ballot shall not include 5those offices within such township, municipality, or ward 6thereof, for which the nomination is uncontested. For purposes 7of this Article, the nomination of an established political 8party of a candidate for election to an office shall be deemed 9to be uncontested where not more than the number of persons to 10be nominated have timely filed valid nomination papers seeking 11the nomination of such party for election to such office.12    (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, 13no primary election shall be held for an established political 14party for any special primary election called for the purpose 15of filling a vacancy in the office of representative in the 16United States Congress where the nomination of such political 17party for said office is uncontested. For the purposes of this 18Article, the nomination of an established political party of a 19candidate for election to said office shall be deemed to be 20uncontested where not more than the number of persons to be 21nominated have timely filed valid nomination papers seeking 22the nomination of such established party for election to said 23office. This subsection (c) shall not apply if such primary 24election is conducted on a regularly scheduled election day.25    (d) (Blank). Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection 26(b) and (c) of this Section, whenever a person who has not   SB2158- 26 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1timely filed valid nomination papers and who intends to become 2a write-in candidate for a political party's nomination for 3any office for which the nomination is uncontested files a 4written statement or notice of that intent with the local 5election official where the candidate is seeking to appear on 6the ballot, a primary ballot shall be prepared and a primary 7shall be held for that office. Such statement or notice shall 8be filed on or before the date established in this Article for 9certifying candidates for the primary ballot. Such statement 10or notice shall contain (i) the name and address of the person 11intending to become a write-in candidate, (ii) a statement 12that the person is a qualified primary elector of the 13political party from whom the nomination is sought, (iii) a 14statement that the person intends to become a write-in 15candidate for the party's nomination, and (iv) the office the 16person is seeking as a write-in candidate. An election 17authority shall have no duty to conduct a primary and prepare a 18primary ballot for any office for which the nomination is 19uncontested, unless a statement or notice meeting the 20requirements of this Section is filed in a timely manner.21    (e) The polls shall be open from 6:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m. 22(Source: P.A. 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    (10 ILCS 5/7-10)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-10)24    Sec. 7-10. Form of petition for nomination. The name of no 25candidate for nomination, or State central committeeperson, or   SB2158- 27 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1township committeeperson, or precinct committeeperson, or ward 2committeeperson or candidate for delegate or alternate 3delegate to national nominating conventions, shall be printed 4upon the primary ballot unless a petition for nomination has 5been filed in his behalf as provided in this Article in 6substantially the following form:7    We, the undersigned, members of and affiliated with the 8.... party and qualified primary electors of the .... party, 9in the .... of ...., in the county of .... and State of 10Illinois, do hereby petition that the following named person 11or persons shall be a candidate or candidates of the .... party 12for the nomination for (or in case of committeepersons for 13election to) the office or offices hereinafter specified, to 14be voted for at the primary election to be held on (insert 15date).16    NameOfficeAddress17John JonesGovernorBelvidere, Ill.18Jane James Lieutenant Governor Peoria, Ill. 19Thomas SmithAttorney GeneralOakland, Ill. 20Name..................         Address....................... 21State of Illinois) 22                 ) ss. 23County of........)24    I, ...., do hereby certify that I reside at No. ....   SB2158- 28 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1street, in the .... of ...., county of ...., and State of 2....., that I am 18 years of age or older, that I am a citizen 3of the United States, and that the signatures on this sheet 4were signed in my presence, and are genuine, and that to the 5best of my knowledge and belief the persons so signing were at 6the time of signing the petitions qualified voters of the .... 7party, and that their respective residences are correctly 8stated, as above set forth.9.........................10    Subscribed and sworn to before me on (insert date).11......................... 12    Each sheet of the petition other than the statement of 13candidacy and candidate's statement shall be of uniform size 14and shall contain above the space for signatures an 15appropriate heading giving the information as to name of 16candidate or candidates, in whose behalf such petition is 17signed; the office, the political party the candidate prefers 18represented and place of residence; and the heading of each 19sheet shall be the same.20    Such petition shall be signed by qualified primary 21electors residing in the political division for which the 22nomination is sought in their own proper persons only and 23opposite the signature of each signer, his residence address 24shall be written or printed. The residence address required to 25be written or printed opposite each qualified primary   SB2158- 29 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1elector's name shall include the street address or rural route 2number of the signer, as the case may be, as well as the 3signer's county, and city, village or town, and state. 4However, the county or city, village or town, and state of 5residence of the electors may be printed on the petition forms 6where all of the electors signing the petition reside in the 7same county or city, village or town, and state. Standard 8abbreviations may be used in writing the residence address, 9including street number, if any. At the bottom of each sheet of 10such petition shall be added a circulator statement signed by 11a person 18 years of age or older who is a citizen of the 12United States, stating the street address or rural route 13number, as the case may be, as well as the county, city, 14village or town, and state; and certifying that the signatures 15on that sheet of the petition were signed in his or her 16presence and certifying that the signatures are genuine; and 17either (1) indicating the dates on which that sheet was 18circulated, or (2) indicating the first and last dates on 19which the sheet was circulated, or (3) for elections where the 20petition circulation period is 90 days, certifying that none 21of the signatures on the sheet were signed more than 90 days 22preceding the last day for the filing of the petition, or (4) 23for the 2022 general primary election only, certify that the 24signatures on the sheet were signed during the period of 25January 13, 2022 through March 14, 2022 or certify that the 26signatures on the sheet were signed during the period of   SB2158- 30 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1January 13, 2022 through the date on which this statement was 2sworn or affirmed to and certifying that to the best of his or 3her knowledge and belief the persons so signing were at the 4time of signing the petitions qualified voters of the 5political party for which a nomination is sought. Such 6statement shall be sworn to before some officer authorized to 7administer oaths in this State.8    Except as otherwise provided in this Code, no petition 9sheet shall be circulated more than 90 days preceding the last 10day provided in Section 7-12 for the filing of such petition.11    The person circulating the petition, or the candidate on 12whose behalf the petition is circulated, may strike any 13signature from the petition, provided that:14        (1) the person striking the signature shall initial 15    the petition at the place where the signature is struck; 16    and17        (2) the person striking the signature shall sign a 18    certification listing the page number and line number of 19    each signature struck from the petition. Such 20    certification shall be filed as a part of the petition.21    Such sheets before being filed shall be neatly fastened 22together in book form, by placing the sheets in a pile and 23fastening them together at one edge in a secure and suitable 24manner, and the sheets shall then be numbered consecutively. 25The sheets shall not be fastened by pasting them together end 26to end, so as to form a continuous strip or roll. All petition   SB2158- 31 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1sheets which are filed with the proper local election 2officials, election authorities or the State Board of 3Elections shall be the original sheets which have been signed 4by the voters and by the circulator thereof, and not 5photocopies or duplicates of such sheets. Each petition must 6include as a part thereof, a statement of candidacy for each of 7the candidates filing, or in whose behalf the petition is 8filed. This statement shall set out the address of such 9candidate, the office for which he is a candidate, shall state 10that the candidate is a qualified primary voter of the party to 11which the petition relates and is qualified for the office 12specified (in the case of a candidate for State's Attorney it 13shall state that the candidate is at the time of filing such 14statement a licensed attorney-at-law of this State), may state 15the political party the candidate prefers, shall state that he 16has filed (or will file before the close of the petition filing 17period) a statement of economic interests as required by the 18Illinois Governmental Ethics Act, shall request that the 19candidate's name be placed upon the official ballot, and shall 20be subscribed and sworn to by such candidate before some 21officer authorized to take acknowledgment of deeds in the 22State and shall be in substantially the following form:23Statement of Candidacy24NameAddressOfficeDistrictParty25John Jones102 Main St.GovernorStatewideRepublican26Belvidere,  SB2158- 32 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1Illinois 2State of Illinois) 3                 ) ss. 4County of .......)5    I, ...., being first duly sworn, say that I reside at .... 6Street in the city (or village) of ...., in the county of ...., 7State of Illinois; that I am a qualified voter therein and am a 8qualified primary voter of the .... party; that I am a 9candidate for nomination (for election in the case of 10committeeperson and delegates and alternate delegates) to the 11office of .... to be voted upon at the primary election to be 12held on (insert date); that I am legally qualified (including 13being the holder of any license that may be an eligibility 14requirement for the office I seek the nomination for) to hold 15such office and that I have filed (or I will file before the 16close of the petition filing period) a statement of economic 17interests as required by the Illinois Governmental Ethics Act 18and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official 19primary ballot for nomination for (or election to in the case 20of committeepersons and delegates and alternate delegates) 21such office.22Signed ......................23    Subscribed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me by ...., 24who is to me personally known, on (insert date).25Signed ....................  SB2158- 33 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1(Official Character)2(Seal, if officer has one.)  3    The petitions, when filed, shall not be withdrawn or added 4to, and no signatures shall be revoked except by revocation 5filed in writing with the State Board of Elections, election 6authority or local election official with whom the petition is 7required to be filed, and before the filing of such petition. 8Whoever forges the name of a signer upon any petition required 9by this Article is deemed guilty of a forgery and on conviction 10thereof shall be punished accordingly.11    A candidate for the offices listed in this Section must 12obtain the number of signatures specified in this Section on 13his or her petition for nomination.14    (a) Statewide office or delegate to a national nominating 15convention. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, if a 16candidate seeks to run for statewide office or as a delegate or 17alternate delegate to a national nominating convention elected 18from the State at-large, then the candidate's petition for 19nomination must contain at least 5,000 but not more than 2010,000 signatures.21    (b) Congressional office or congressional delegate to a 22national nominating convention. Except as otherwise provided 23in this Code, if a candidate seeks to run for United States 24Congress or as a congressional delegate or alternate 25congressional delegate to a national nominating convention   SB2158- 34 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1elected from a congressional district, then the candidate's 2petition for nomination must contain at least the number of 3signatures equal to 0.5% of the qualified primary electors of 4his or her party in his or her congressional district. In the 5first primary election following a redistricting of 6congressional districts, a candidate's petition for nomination 7must contain at least 600 signatures of qualified primary 8electors of the candidate's political party in his or her 9congressional district.10    (c) County office. Except as otherwise provided in this 11Code, if a candidate seeks to run for any countywide office, 12including, but not limited to, county board chairperson or 13county board member, elected on an at-large basis, in a county 14other than Cook County, then the candidate's petition for 15nomination must contain at least the number of signatures 16equal to 0.5% of the qualified electors of his or her party who 17cast votes at the last preceding general election in his or her 18county. If a candidate seeks to run for county board member 19elected from a county board district, then the candidate's 20petition for nomination must contain at least the number of 21signatures equal to 0.5% of the qualified primary electors of 22his or her party in the county board district. In the first 23primary election following a redistricting of county board 24districts or the initial establishment of county board 25districts, a candidate's petition for nomination must contain 26at least the number of signatures equal to 0.5% of the   SB2158- 35 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1qualified electors of his or her party in the entire county who 2cast votes at the last preceding general election divided by 3the total number of county board districts comprising the 4county board; provided that in no event shall the number of 5signatures be less than 25.6    (d) County office; Cook County only.7        (1) If a candidate seeks to run for countywide office 8    in Cook County, then the candidate's petition for 9    nomination must contain at least the number of signatures 10    equal to 0.5% of the qualified electors of his or her party 11    who cast votes at the last preceding general election in 12    Cook County.13        (2) If a candidate seeks to run for Cook County Board 14    Commissioner, then the candidate's petition for nomination 15    must contain at least the number of signatures equal to 16    0.5% of the qualified primary electors of his or her party 17    in his or her county board district. In the first primary 18    election following a redistricting of Cook County Board of 19    Commissioners districts, a candidate's petition for 20    nomination must contain at least the number of signatures 21    equal to 0.5% of the qualified electors of his or her party 22    in the entire county who cast votes at the last preceding 23    general election divided by the total number of county 24    board districts comprising the county board; provided that 25    in no event shall the number of signatures be less than 25.26        (3) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, if a   SB2158- 36 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    candidate seeks to run for Cook County Board of Review 2    Commissioner, which is elected from a district pursuant to 3    subsection (c) of Section 5-5 of the Property Tax Code, 4    then the candidate's petition for nomination must contain 5    at least the number of signatures equal to 0.5% of the 6    total number of registered voters in his or her board of 7    review district in the last general election at which a 8    commissioner was regularly scheduled to be elected from 9    that board of review district. In no event shall the 10    number of signatures required be greater than the 11    requisite number for a candidate who seeks countywide 12    office in Cook County under subsection (d)(1) of this 13    Section. In the first primary election following a 14    redistricting of Cook County Board of Review districts, a 15    candidate's petition for nomination must contain at least 16    4,000 signatures or at least the number of signatures 17    required for a countywide candidate in Cook County, 18    whichever is less, of the qualified electors of his or her 19    party in the district.20    (e) Municipal or township office. If a candidate seeks to 21run for municipal or township office, then the candidate's 22petition for nomination must contain at least the number of 23signatures equal to 0.5% of the qualified primary electors of 24his or her party in the municipality or township. If a 25candidate seeks to run for alderperson of a municipality, then 26the candidate's petition for nomination must contain at least   SB2158- 37 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the number of signatures equal to 0.5% of the qualified 2primary electors of his or her party of the ward. In the first 3primary election following redistricting of wards or trustee 4districts of a municipality or the initial establishment of 5wards or districts, a candidate's petition for nomination must 6contain the number of signatures equal to at least 0.5% of the 7total number of votes cast for the candidate of that political 8party who received the highest number of votes in the entire 9municipality at the last regular election at which an officer 10was regularly scheduled to be elected from the entire 11municipality, divided by the number of wards or districts. In 12no event shall the number of signatures be less than 25.13    (f) State central committeeperson. If a candidate seeks to 14run for State central committeeperson, then the candidate's 15petition for nomination must contain at least 100 signatures 16of the primary electors of his or her party of his or her 17congressional district.18    (g) Sanitary district trustee. Except as otherwise 19provided in this Code, if a candidate seeks to run for trustee 20of a sanitary district in which trustees are not elected from 21wards, then the candidate's petition for nomination must 22contain at least the number of signatures equal to 0.5% of the 23primary electors of his or her party from the sanitary 24district. If a candidate seeks to run for trustee of a sanitary 25district in which trustees are elected from wards, then the 26candidate's petition for nomination must contain at least the   SB2158- 38 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1number of signatures equal to 0.5% of the primary electors of 2his or her party in the ward of that sanitary district. In the 3first primary election following redistricting of sanitary 4districts elected from wards, a candidate's petition for 5nomination must contain at least the signatures of 150 6qualified primary electors of his or her ward of that sanitary 7district.8    (h) Judicial office. Except as otherwise provided in this 9Code, if a candidate seeks to run for judicial office in a 10district, then the candidate's petition for nomination must 11contain the number of signatures equal to 0.4% of the number of 12votes cast in that district for the candidate for his or her 13political party for the office of Governor at the last general 14election at which a Governor was elected, but in no event less 15than 500 signatures. If a candidate seeks to run for judicial 16office in a circuit or subcircuit, then the candidate's 17petition for nomination must contain the number of signatures 18equal to 0.25% of the number of votes cast for the judicial 19candidate of his or her political party who received the 20highest number of votes at the last general election at which a 21judicial officer from the same circuit or subcircuit was 22regularly scheduled to be elected, but in no event less than 231,000 signatures in circuits and subcircuits located in the 24First Judicial District or 500 signatures in every other 25Judicial District.26    (i) Precinct, ward, and township committeeperson. Except   SB2158- 39 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1as otherwise provided in this Code, if a candidate seeks to run 2for precinct committeeperson, then the candidate's petition 3for nomination must contain at least 10 signatures of the 4primary electors of his or her party for the precinct. If a 5candidate seeks to run for ward committeeperson, then the 6candidate's petition for nomination must contain no less than 7the number of signatures equal to 10% of the primary electors 8of his or her party of the ward, but no more than 16% of those 9same electors; provided that the maximum number of signatures 10may be 50 more than the minimum number, whichever is greater. 11If a candidate seeks to run for township committeeperson, then 12the candidate's petition for nomination must contain no less 13than the number of signatures equal to 5% of the primary 14electors of his or her party of the township, but no more than 158% of those same electors; provided that the maximum number of 16signatures may be 50 more than the minimum number, whichever 17is greater.18    (j) State's attorney or regional superintendent of schools 19for multiple counties. If a candidate seeks to run for State's 20attorney or regional Superintendent of Schools who serves more 21than one county, then the candidate's petition for nomination 22must contain at least the number of signatures equal to 0.5% of 23the primary electors of his or her party in the territory 24comprising the counties.25    (k) Any other office. If a candidate seeks any other 26office, then the candidate's petition for nomination must   SB2158- 40 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1contain at least the number of signatures equal to 0.5% of the 2registered voters of the political subdivision, district, or 3division for which the nomination is made or 25 signatures, 4whichever is greater.5    For purposes of this Section the number of primary 6electors shall be determined by taking the total vote cast, in 7the applicable district, for the candidate for that political 8party who received the highest number of votes, statewide, at 9the last general election in the State at which electors for 10President of the United States were elected. For political 11subdivisions, the number of primary electors shall be 12determined by taking the total vote cast for the candidate for 13that political party who received the highest number of votes 14in the political subdivision at the last regular election at 15which an officer was regularly scheduled to be elected from 16that subdivision. For wards or districts of political 17subdivisions, the number of primary electors shall be 18determined by taking the total vote cast for the candidate for 19that political party who received the highest number of votes 20in the ward or district at the last regular election at which 21an officer was regularly scheduled to be elected from that 22ward or district.23    A "qualified primary elector" of a party may not sign 24petitions for or be a candidate in the primary of more than one 25party.26    The changes made to this Section by Public Act 93-574 are   SB2158- 41 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1declarative of existing law, except for item (3) of subsection 2(d).3    Petitions of candidates for nomination for offices herein 4specified, to be filed with the same officer, may contain the 5names of 2 or more candidates of the same political party for 6the same or different offices. In the case of the offices of 7Governor and Lieutenant Governor, a joint petition including 8one candidate for each of those offices must be filed. 9(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 10102-692, eff. 1-7-22.) 11    (10 ILCS 5/7-43)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-43)12    Sec. 7-43. (a) Every person having resided in this State 6 13months and in the precinct 30 days next preceding any primary 14therein who shall be a citizen of the United States of the age 15of 18 or more years shall be entitled to vote at such primary.16    The following regulations shall be applicable to 17primaries:18        No person shall be entitled to vote at a primary:19            (a) Unless he declares his party affiliations as 20        required by this Article.21            (b) (Blank). 22            (c) (Blank). 23            (c.5) If that person has participated in the town 24        political party caucus, under Section 45-50 of the 25        Township Code, of another political party by signing   SB2158- 42 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1        an affidavit of voters attending the caucus within 45 2        days before the first day of the calendar month in 3        which the primary is held.4            (d) (Blank). 5    (b) In cities, villages, and incorporated towns having a 6board of election commissioners, only voters registered as 7provided by Article 6 of this Code shall be entitled to vote at 8such primary.9    (c) No person shall be entitled to vote at a primary unless 10he is registered under the provisions of Article 4, 5, or 6 of 11this Code, when his registration is required by any of said 12Articles to entitle him to vote at the election with reference 13to which the primary is held.14    A person (i) who filed a statement of candidacy for a 15partisan office as a qualified primary voter of an established 16political party or (ii) who voted the ballot of an established 17political party at a general primary election may not file a 18statement of candidacy as a candidate of a different 19established political party, a new political party, or as an 20independent candidate for a partisan office to be filled at 21the general election immediately following the general primary 22for which the person filed the statement or voted the ballot. A 23person may file a statement of candidacy for a partisan office 24as a qualified primary voter of an established political party 25regardless of any prior filing of candidacy for a partisan 26office or voting the ballot of an established political party   SB2158- 43 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1at any prior election.2(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 3    (10 ILCS 5/7-44)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-44)4    Sec. 7-44. Voters; primary ballot. Any person desiring to 5vote at a primary shall state the person's his name and , 6residence and party affiliation to the primary judges, one of 7whom shall thereupon announce the same in a distinct tone of 8voice, sufficiently loud to be heard by all persons in the 9polling place. When article 4, 5 or 6 is applicable the 10Certificate of Registered Voter therein prescribed shall be 11made and signed and the official poll record shall be made. If 12the person desiring to vote is not challenged, one of the 13primary judges shall give to the person him one, and only one, 14primary ballot that lists each candidate for office 15participating in the primary election, regardless of party 16affiliation of the political party with which he declares 17himself affiliated, on the back of which such primary judge 18shall endorse the person's his initials in such manner that 19they may be seen when the primary ballot is properly folded. If 20the person desiring to vote is challenged the person he shall 21not receive a primary ballot from the primary judges until the 22person he shall have established the person's his right to 23vote as hereinafter provided. No person who refuses to state 24his party affiliation shall be allowed to vote at a primary.25    A person who declares his party affiliation with a   SB2158- 44 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1statewide established political party and requests a primary 2ballot of such party may nonetheless also declare his 3affiliation with a political party established only within a 4political subdivision, and may also vote in the primary of 5such local party on the same election day, provided that such 6voter may not vote in both such party primaries with respect to 7offices of the same political subdivision. However, no person 8declaring his affiliation with a statewide established 9political party may vote in the primary of any other statewide 10political party on the same election day.11(Source: P.A. 81-1535.)  12    (10 ILCS 5/7-60)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-60)13    Sec. 7-60. Not less than 74 days before the date of the 14general election, the State Board of Elections shall certify 15to the county clerks the names of each of the candidates who 16have been nominated as shown by the proclamation of the State 17Board of Elections as a canvassing board or who have been 18nominated to fill a vacancy in nomination and direct the 19election authority to place upon the official ballot for the 20general election the names of such candidates in the same 21manner and in the same order as shown upon the certification, 22except as otherwise provided in this Code.23    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 2 24candidates in any primary election who receive the most votes 25in the primary election, regardless of the party affiliation   SB2158- 45 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1of the candidates, shall be the only 2 candidates certified to 2participate in the general election.3    Except as otherwise provided in this Code, not less than 468 days before the date of the general election, each county 5clerk shall certify the names of each of the candidates for 6county offices who have been nominated as shown by the 7proclamation of the county election authority or who have been 8nominated to fill a vacancy in nomination and declare that the 9names of such candidates for the respective offices shall be 10placed upon the official ballot for the general election in 11the same manner and in the same order as shown upon the 12certification, except as otherwise provided by this Section. 13Each county clerk shall place a copy of the certification on 14file in his or her office and at the same time issue to the 15State Board of Elections a copy of such certification. In 16addition, each county clerk in whose county there is a board of 17election commissioners shall, not less than 68 days before the 18date of the general election, issue to such board a copy of the 19certification that has been filed in the county clerk's 20office, together with a copy of the certification that has 21been issued to the clerk by the State Board of Elections, with 22directions to the board of election commissioners to place 23upon the official ballot for the general election in that 24election jurisdiction the names of all candidates that are 25listed on such certifications, in the same manner and in the 26same order as shown upon such certifications, except as   SB2158- 46 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1otherwise provided in this Section.2    Whenever there are two or more persons nominated by the 3same political party for multiple offices for any board, the 4name of the candidate of such party receiving the highest 5number of votes in the primary election as a candidate for such 6office, as shown by the official election returns of the 7primary, shall be certified first under the name of such 8offices, and the names of the remaining candidates of such 9party for such offices shall follow in the order of the number 10of votes received by them respectively at the primary election 11as shown by the official election results.12    No person who is shown by the final proclamation to have 13been nominated or elected at the primary as a write-in 14candidate shall have his or her name certified unless such 15person shall have filed with the certifying office or board 16within 10 days after the election authority's proclamation a 17statement of candidacy pursuant to Section 7-10, a statement 18pursuant to Section 7-10.1, and a receipt for the filing of a 19statement of economic interests in relation to the unit of 20government to which he or she has been elected or nominated. 21    Each county clerk and board of election commissioners 22shall determine by a fair and impartial method of random 23selection the order of placement of established political 24party candidates for the general election ballot. Such 25determination shall be made within 30 days following the 26canvass and proclamation of the results of the general primary   SB2158- 47 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1in the office of the county clerk or board of election 2commissioners and shall be open to the public. Seven days 3written notice of the time and place of conducting such random 4selection shall be given, by each such election authority, to 5the County Chair of each established political party, and to 6each organization of citizens within the election jurisdiction 7which was entitled, under this Article, at the next preceding 8election, to have pollwatchers present on the day of election. 9Each election authority shall post in a conspicuous, open and 10public place, at the entrance of the election authority 11office, notice of the time and place of such lottery. However, 12a board of election commissioners may elect to place 13established political party candidates on the general election 14ballot in the same order determined by the county clerk of the 15county in which the city under the jurisdiction of such board 16is located.17    Each certification shall indicate, where applicable, the 18following:19        (1) The political party affiliation of the candidates 20    for the respective offices;21        (2) If there is to be more than one candidate elected 22    to an office from the State, political subdivision or 23    district;24        (3) If the voter has the right to vote for more than 25    one candidate for an office;26        (4) The term of office, if a vacancy is to be filled   SB2158- 48 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    for less than a full term or if the offices to be filled in 2    a political subdivision are for different terms.3    The State Board of Elections or the county clerk, as the 4case may be, shall issue an amended certification whenever it 5is discovered that the original certification is in error.6(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 7    (10 ILCS 5/19-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-3)8    Sec. 19-3. Application for a vote by mail ballot.9    (a) The application for a vote by mail ballot for a single 10election shall be substantially in the following form:11APPLICATION FOR VOTE BY MAIL BALLOT12    To be voted at the .... election in the County of .... and 13State of Illinois.14    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 15.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 16for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 17the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 18by mail.19    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 20ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 21shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 22the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 23election or, if returned by mail, postmarked no later than 24election day, for counting no later than during the period for 25counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the   SB2158- 49 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b114th day following election day.2    I understand that this application is made for an official 3vote by mail ballot or ballots to be voted by me at the 4election specified in this application and that I must submit 5a separate application for an official vote by mail ballot or 6ballots to be voted by me at any subsequent election. 7    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Section 829-10 of the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 9statements set forth in this application are true and correct.10....11*fill in either (1), (2) or (3).12Post office address to which ballot is mailed:13...............14    (a-5) The application for a single vote by mail ballot 15transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 16substantively similar to the application for a vote by mail 17ballot for a single election and shall include:18        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a print 19    disability, and, as a result of this disability, I am 20    making a request to receive a vote by mail ballot 21    electronically so that I may privately and independently 22    mark, verify, and print my vote by mail ballot. 23    (b) The application for permanent vote by mail status 24shall be substantially in the following form:25APPLICATION FOR PERMANENT VOTE BY MAIL STATUS26    I am currently a registered voter and wish to apply for   SB2158- 50 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1permanent vote by mail status.2    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 3.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 4for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 5the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 6by mail in:7    ..... all subsequent elections that do not require a party 8        designation. 9    ..... all subsequent elections, and I wish to receive a 10        ................... Party vote by mail ballot in 11        elections that require a party designation.12    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 13ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 14shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 15the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 16election or, if returned by mail, postmarked no later than 17election day, for counting no later than during the period for 18counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 1914th day following election day.20    Under penalties as provided by law under Section 29-10 of 21the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 22statements set forth in this application are true and correct.23.... 24Post office address to which ballot is mailed:25...............26    (b-5) The application for permanent vote by mail ballots   SB2158- 51 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 2substantively similar to the application for permanent vote by 3mail status and shall include: 4        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a 5    non-temporary print disability, and as a result of this 6    disability, I am making a request to receive vote by mail 7    ballots electronically so that I may privately and 8    independently mark, verify, and print my vote by mail 9    ballots. 10    (c) (Blank). However, if application is made for a primary 11election ballot, such application shall require the applicant 12to designate the name of the political party with which the 13applicant is affiliated. The election authority shall allow 14any voter on permanent vote by mail status to change his or her 15party affiliation for a primary election ballot by a method 16and deadline published and selected by the election authority. 17    (d) If application is made electronically, the applicant 18shall mark the box associated with the above described 19statement included as part of the online application 20certifying that the statements set forth in the application 21under subsection (a) or (b) are true and correct, and a 22signature is not required. 23    (e) Any person may produce, reproduce, distribute, or 24return to an election authority an application under this 25Section. If applications are sent to a post office box 26controlled by any individual or organization that is not an   SB2158- 52 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1election authority, those applications shall (i) include a 2valid and current phone number for the individual or 3organization controlling the post office box and (ii) be 4turned over to the appropriate election authority within 7 5days of receipt or, if received within 2 weeks of the election 6in which an applicant intends to vote, within 2 days of 7receipt. Failure to turn over the applications in compliance 8with this paragraph shall constitute a violation of this Code 9and shall be punishable as a petty offense with a fine of $100 10per application. Removing, tampering with, or otherwise 11knowingly making the postmark on the application unreadable by 12the election authority shall establish a rebuttable 13presumption of a violation of this paragraph. Upon receipt, 14the appropriate election authority shall accept and promptly 15process any application under this Section submitted in a form 16substantially similar to that required by this Section, 17including any substantially similar production or reproduction 18generated by the applicant.19    (f) An election authority may combine the applications in 20subsections (a) and (b) onto one form, but the distinction 21between the applications must be clear and the form must 22provide check boxes for an applicant to indicate whether he or 23she is applying for a single election vote by mail ballot or 24for permanent vote by mail status. 25(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-819, eff. 5-13-22; 26103-467, eff. 8-4-23.)   SB2158- 53 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    (10 ILCS 5/19-4.5 new)2    Sec. 19-4.5. Absentee primary ballots.3    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 4entitled to vote by absentee ballot in a primary election 5shall not be required to declare his or her political party 6affiliation and shall be provided with the ballot listing all 7candidates for offices for which the absentee voter is 8entitled to vote in that primary election. The ballots 9provided to absentee voters shall be the same open-primary 10ballots as provided under Section 7-44.11    (b) With respect to the marking, casting, and counting of 12primary election ballots, absentee voting shall be conducted 13in accordance with Sections 7-44 and other provisions of this 14Article. 15    (10 ILCS 5/19-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-5)16    Sec. 19-5. Folding and enclosure of ballots in unsealed 17envelope; address on envelope; certification; instructions for 18marking and returning ballots. It shall be the duty of the 19election authority to fold the ballot or ballots in the manner 20specified by the statute for folding ballots prior to their 21deposit in the ballot box, and to enclose such ballot or 22ballots in an envelope unsealed to be furnished by the 23election authority, which envelope shall bear upon the face 24thereof the name, official title and post office address of   SB2158- 54 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the election authority, and upon the other side a printed 2certification in substantially the following form:3    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 4.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 5for at least 30 days; and that I am lawfully entitled to cast a 6ballot.7    I further state that I personally marked the enclosed 8ballot in secret. 9    Under penalties of perjury as provided by law pursuant to 10Section 29-10 of The Election Code, the undersigned certifies 11that the statements set forth in this certification are true 12and correct. 13.......................14    If the ballot is to go to an elector who is physically 15incapacitated and needs assistance marking the ballot, the 16envelope shall bear upon the back thereof a certification in 17substantially the following form:18    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 19.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 20for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to cast a 21ballot; and that I am physically incapable of personally 22marking the ballot for this election.23    I further state that I marked the enclosed ballot in 24secret with the assistance of 25.................................26(Individual rendering assistance)  SB2158- 55 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1.................................2(Residence Address)3    Under penalties of perjury as provided by law pursuant to 4Section 29-10 of The Election Code, the undersigned certifies 5that the statements set forth in this certification are true 6and correct. 7.......................8    In the case of a voter with a physical incapacity, marking 9a ballot in secret includes marking a ballot with the 10assistance of another individual, other than a candidate whose 11name appears on the ballot (unless the voter is the spouse or a 12parent, child, brother, or sister of the candidate), the 13voter's employer, an agent of that employer, or an officer or 14agent of the voter's union, when the voter's physical 15incapacity necessitates such assistance.16    In the case of a physically incapacitated voter, marking a 17ballot in secret includes marking a ballot with the assistance 18of another individual, other than a candidate whose name 19appears on the ballot (unless the voter is the spouse or a 20parent, child, brother, or sister of the candidate), the 21voter's employer, an agent of that employer, or an officer or 22agent of the voter's union, when the voter's physical 23incapacity necessitates such assistance. 24    Provided, that if the ballot enclosed is to be voted at a 25primary election, the certification shall designate the name 26of the political party with which the voter is affiliated.  SB2158- 56 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    In addition to the above, the election authority shall 2provide printed slips, or an electronic version thereof for 3voters voting by mail pursuant to Section 19-2.6, giving full 4instructions regarding the manner of marking and returning the 5ballot in order that the same may be counted, and shall furnish 6one of such printed slips or the electronic version thereof 7for voters voting by mail pursuant to Section 19-2.6 to each of 8such applicants at the same time the ballot is delivered to 9him. Such instructions shall include the following statement: 10"In signing the certification on the vote by mail ballot 11envelope, you are attesting that you personally marked this 12vote by mail ballot in secret. If you are physically unable to 13mark the ballot, a friend or relative may assist you after 14completing the enclosed affidavit. Federal and State laws 15prohibit a candidate whose name appears on the ballot (unless 16you are the spouse or a parent, child, brother, or sister of 17the candidate), your employer, your employer's agent or an 18officer or agent of your union from assisting voters with 19physical disabilities." 20    In addition to the above, if a ballot to be provided to an 21elector pursuant to this Section contains a public question 22described in subsection (b) of Section 28-6 and the territory 23concerning which the question is to be submitted is not 24described on the ballot due to the space limitations of such 25ballot, the election authority shall provide a printed copy of 26a notice of the public question, which shall include a   SB2158- 57 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1description of the territory in the manner required by Section 216-7. The notice shall be furnished to the elector at the same 3time the ballot is delivered to the elector. 4    Election authorities transmitting ballots by electronic 5transmission pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall, to the greatest 6extent possible, provide those applicants with the same 7instructions, certifications, and other balloting materials 8required when sending ballots by mail. 9(Source: P.A. 102-819, eff. 5-13-22; 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 10    (10 ILCS 5/19-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-8)11    Sec. 19-8. Time and place of counting ballots.12    (a) (Blank.)13    (b) Each vote by mail voter's ballot returned to an 14election authority, by any means authorized by this Article, 15and received by that election authority before the closing of 16the polls on election day shall be endorsed by the receiving 17election authority with the day and hour of receipt and may be 18processed by the election authority beginning on the day it is 19received by the election authority in the central ballot 20counting location of the election authority, but the results 21of the processing may not be counted until the day of the 22election after 7:00 p.m., except as provided in subsections 23(g) and (g-5). 24    (c) Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an 25election authority and postmarked no later than election day,   SB2158- 58 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1but that is received by the election authority after the polls 2close on election day and before the close of the period for 3counting provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be 4endorsed by the receiving authority with the day and hour of 5receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot counting 6location of the election authority during the period for 7counting provisional ballots.8    Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an 9election authority absent a postmark or a barcode usable with 10an intelligent mail barcode tracking system, but that is 11received by the election authority after the polls close on 12election day and before the close of the period for counting 13provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be endorsed 14by the receiving authority with the day and hour of receipt, 15opened to inspect the date inserted on the certification, and, 16if the certification date is election day or earlier and the 17ballot is otherwise found to be valid under the requirements 18of this Section, counted at the central ballot counting 19location of the election authority during the period for 20counting provisional ballots. Absent a date on the 21certification, the ballot shall not be counted. 22    If an election authority is using an intelligent mail 23barcode tracking system, a ballot that is mailed to an 24election authority absent a postmark may be counted if the 25intelligent mail barcode tracking system verifies the envelope 26was mailed no later than election day.  SB2158- 59 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    (d) Special write-in vote by mail voter's blank ballots 2returned to an election authority, by any means authorized by 3this Article, and received by the election authority at any 4time before the closing of the polls on election day shall be 5endorsed by the receiving election authority with the day and 6hour of receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot 7counting location of the election authority during the same 8period provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots 9under subsections (b), (g), and (g-5). Special write-in vote 10by mail voter's blank ballots that are mailed to an election 11authority and postmarked no later than election day, but that 12are received by the election authority after the polls close 13on election day and before the closing of the period for 14counting provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be 15endorsed by the receiving authority with the day and hour of 16receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot counting 17location of the election authority during the same periods 18provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots under 19subsection (c).20    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, vote by 21mail voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's 22blank ballots received by the election authority after the 23closing of the polls on an election day shall be endorsed by 24the election authority receiving them with the day and hour of 25receipt and shall be safely kept unopened by the election 26authority for the period of time required for the preservation   SB2158- 60 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1of ballots used at the election, and shall then, without being 2opened, be destroyed in like manner as the used ballots of that 3election.4    (f) Counting required under this Section to begin on 5election day after the closing of the polls shall commence no 6later than 8:00 p.m. and shall be conducted by a panel or 7panels of election judges appointed in the manner provided by 8law. The counting shall continue until all vote by mail 9voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's 10blank ballots required to be counted on election day have been 11counted.12    (g) The procedures set forth in Articles 17 and 18 and, 13with respect to primary elections, the procedures set forth in 14Section 19-4.5, of this Code shall apply to all ballots 15counted under this Section. In addition, within 2 days after a 16vote by mail ballot is received, but in all cases before the 17close of the period for counting provisional ballots, the 18election judge or official shall compare the voter's signature 19on the certification envelope of that vote by mail ballot with 20the voter's signature on the application verified in 21accordance with Section 19-4 or the signature of the voter on 22file in the office of the election authority. If the election 23judge or official determines that the 2 signatures match, and 24that the vote by mail voter is otherwise qualified to cast a 25vote by mail ballot, the election authority shall cast and 26count the ballot on election day or the day the ballot is   SB2158- 61 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1determined to be valid, whichever is later, adding the results 2to the precinct in which the voter is registered. If the 3election judge or official determines that the signatures do 4not match, or that the vote by mail voter is not qualified to 5cast a vote by mail ballot, then without opening the 6certification envelope, the judge or official shall mark 7across the face of the certification envelope the word 8"Rejected" and shall not cast or count the ballot.9    In addition to the voter's signatures not matching, a vote 10by mail ballot may be rejected by the election judge or 11official:12        (1) if the ballot envelope is open or has been opened 13    and resealed;14        (2) if the voter has already cast an early or grace 15    period ballot;16        (3) if the voter voted in person on election day or the 17    voter is not a duly registered voter in the precinct; or18        (4) on any other basis set forth in this Code.19    If the election judge or official determines that any of 20these reasons apply, the judge or official shall mark across 21the face of the certification envelope the word "Rejected" and 22shall not cast or count the ballot. 23    (g-5) If a vote by mail ballot is rejected by the election 24judge or official for any reason, the election authority 25shall, within 2 days after the rejection but in all cases 26before the close of the period for counting provisional   SB2158- 62 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1ballots, notify the vote by mail voter that his or her ballot 2was rejected. The notice shall inform the voter of the reason 3or reasons the ballot was rejected and shall state that the 4voter may appear before the election authority, on or before 5the 14th day after the election, to show cause as to why the 6ballot should not be rejected. The voter may present evidence 7to the election authority supporting his or her contention 8that the ballot should be counted. The election authority 9shall appoint a panel of 3 election judges to review the 10contested ballot, application, and certification envelope, as 11well as any evidence submitted by the vote by mail voter. No 12more than 2 election judges on the reviewing panel shall be of 13the same political party. The reviewing panel of election 14judges shall make a final determination as to the validity of 15the contested vote by mail ballot. The judges' determination 16shall not be reviewable either administratively or judicially.17    A vote by mail ballot subject to this subsection that is 18determined to be valid shall be counted before the close of the 19period for counting provisional ballots. 20    If a vote by mail ballot is rejected for any reason, the 21election authority shall, within one day after the rejection, 22transmit to the State Board of Elections by electronic means 23the voter's name, street address, email address and precinct, 24ward, township, and district numbers, as the case may be. If a 25rejected vote by mail ballot is determined to be valid, the 26election authority shall, within one day after the   SB2158- 63 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1determination, remove the name of the voter from the list 2transmitted to the State Board of Elections. The State Board 3of Elections shall maintain the names and information in an 4electronic format on its website accessible to State and local 5political committees.6    Upon request by the State or local political committee, 7each election authority shall, within one day after the 8request, provide the following information about all rejected 9vote by mail ballots: voter's name, street address, email 10address and precinct, ward, township, and district numbers, as 11the case may be. 12    (g-10) All vote by mail ballots determined to be valid 13shall be added to the vote totals for the precincts for which 14they were cast in the order in which the ballots were opened. 15    (h) Each political party, candidate, and qualified civic 16organization shall be entitled to have present one pollwatcher 17for each panel of election judges therein assigned. 18(Source: P.A. 102-1126, eff. 2-10-23; 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 19    (10 ILCS 5/19-12.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-12.1)20    Sec. 19-12.1. Any qualified elector who has secured an 21Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card in 22accordance with the Illinois Identification Card Act, 23indicating that the person named thereon has a Class 1A or 24Class 2 disability or any qualified voter who has a permanent 25physical incapacity of such a nature as to make it improbable   SB2158- 64 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1that he will be able to be present at the polls at any future 2election, or any voter who is a resident of (i) a federally 3operated veterans' home, hospital, or facility located in 4Illinois or (ii) a facility licensed or certified pursuant to 5the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 6Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 7the MC/DD Act and has a condition or disability of such a 8nature as to make it improbable that he will be able to be 9present at the polls at any future election, may secure a 10voter's identification card for persons with disabilities or a 11nursing home resident's identification card, which will enable 12him to vote under this Article as a physically incapacitated 13or nursing home voter. For the purposes of this Section, 14"federally operated veterans' home, hospital, or facility" 15means the long-term care facilities at the Jesse Brown VA 16Medical Center, Illiana Health Care System, Edward Hines, Jr. 17VA Hospital, Marion VA Medical Center, and Captain James A. 18Lovell Federal Health Care Center. 19    Application for a voter's identification card for persons 20with disabilities or a nursing home resident's identification 21card shall be made either: (a) in writing, with voter's sworn 22affidavit, to the county clerk or board of election 23commissioners, as the case may be, and shall be accompanied by 24the affidavit of the attending physician, advanced practice 25registered nurse, or a physician assistant specifically 26describing the nature of the physical incapacity or the fact   SB2158- 65 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1that the voter is a nursing home resident and is physically 2unable to be present at the polls on election days; or (b) by 3presenting, in writing or otherwise, to the county clerk or 4board of election commissioners, as the case may be, proof 5that the applicant has secured an Illinois Person with a 6Disability Identification Card indicating that the person 7named thereon has a Class 1A or Class 2 disability. Upon the 8receipt of either the sworn-to application and the 9physician's, advanced practice registered nurse's, or a 10physician assistant's affidavit or proof that the applicant 11has secured an Illinois Person with a Disability 12Identification Card indicating that the person named thereon 13has a Class 1A or Class 2 disability, the county clerk or board 14of election commissioners shall issue a voter's identification 15card for persons with disabilities or a nursing home 16resident's identification card. Such identification cards 17shall be issued for a period of 5 years, upon the expiration of 18which time the voter may secure a new card by making 19application in the same manner as is prescribed for the 20issuance of an original card, accompanied by a new affidavit 21of the attending physician, advanced practice registered 22nurse, or a physician assistant. The date of expiration of 23such five-year period shall be made known to any interested 24person by the election authority upon the request of such 25person. Applications for the renewal of the identification 26cards shall be mailed to the voters holding such cards not less   SB2158- 66 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1than 3 months prior to the date of expiration of the cards.2    Each voter's identification card for persons with 3disabilities or nursing home resident's identification card 4shall bear an identification number, which shall be clearly 5noted on the voter's original and duplicate registration 6record cards. In the event the holder becomes physically 7capable of resuming normal voting, he must surrender his 8voter's identification card for persons with disabilities or 9nursing home resident's identification card to the county 10clerk or board of election commissioners before the next 11election.12    The holder of a voter's identification card for persons 13with disabilities or a nursing home resident's identification 14card may make application by mail for an official ballot 15within the time prescribed by Section 19-2. Such application 16shall contain the same information as is included in the form 17of application for ballot by a physically incapacitated 18elector prescribed in Section 19-3 except that it shall also 19include the applicant's voter's identification card for 20persons with disabilities card number and except that it need 21not be sworn to. If an examination of the records discloses 22that the applicant is lawfully entitled to vote, he shall be 23mailed a ballot as provided in Section 19-4 and, if 24applicable, as provided in Section 19-4.5. The ballot envelope 25shall be the same as that prescribed in Section 19-5 for voters 26with physical disabilities, and the manner of voting and   SB2158- 67 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1returning the ballot shall be the same as that provided in this 2Article for other vote by mail ballots, except that a 3statement to be subscribed to by the voter but which need not 4be sworn to shall be placed on the ballot envelope in lieu of 5the affidavit prescribed by Section 19-5.6    Any person who knowingly subscribes to a false statement 7in connection with voting under this Section shall be guilty 8of a Class A misdemeanor.9    For the purposes of this Section, "nursing home resident" 10includes a resident of (i) a federally operated veterans' 11home, hospital, or facility located in Illinois or (ii) a 12facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act, the 13MC/DD Act, or the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act 14of 2013. For the purposes of this Section, "federally operated 15veterans' home, hospital, or facility" means the long-term 16care facilities at the Jesse Brown VA Medical Center, Illiana 17Health Care System, Edward Hines, Jr. VA Hospital, Marion VA 18Medical Center, and Captain James A. Lovell Federal Health 19Care Center. 20(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15; 2199-581, eff. 1-1-17; 99-642, eff. 6-28-16; 100-513, eff. 221-1-18.) 23    (10 ILCS 5/20-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-3)24    Sec. 20-3. The election authority shall furnish the 25following applications for registration by mail or vote by   SB2158- 68 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1mail ballot which shall be considered a method of application 2in lieu of the official postcard.3    1. Members of the United States Service and citizens of 4the United States temporarily residing outside the territorial 5limits of the United States may make application within the 6periods prescribed in Sections 20-2 or 20-2.1, as the case may 7be. Such application shall be substantially in the following 8form:9"APPLICATION FOR BALLOT10    To be voted at the ............ election in the precinct 11in which is located my residence at ..............., in the 12city/village/township of ............(insert home address) 13County of ........... and State of Illinois.14    I state that I am a citizen of the United States; that on 15(insert date of election) I shall have resided in the State of 16Illinois and in the election precinct for 30 days; that on the 17above date I shall be the age of 18 years or above; that I am 18lawfully entitled to vote in such precinct at that election; 19that I am (check category 1, 2, or 3 below):20    1.  ( ) a member of the United States Service,21    2.  ( ) a citizen of the United States temporarily 22residing outside the territorial limits of the United States 23and that I expect to be absent from the said county of my 24residence on the date of holding such election, and that I will 25have no opportunity to vote in person on that day.26    I hereby make application for an official ballot or   SB2158- 69 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1ballots to be voted by me at such election if I am absent from 2the said county of my residence, and I agree that I shall 3return said ballot or ballots to the election authority 4postmarked no later than election day, for counting no later 5than during the period for counting provisional ballots, the 6last day of which is the 14th day following election day or 7shall destroy said ballot or ballots.8    (Check below only if category 2 and not previously 9registered)10    ( ) I hereby make application to become registered as a 11voter and agree to return the forms and affidavits for 12registration to the election authority not later than 30 days 13before the election.14    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Article 29 15of the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 16statements set forth in this application are true and correct.17.........................18    Post office address or service address to which 19registration materials or ballot should be mailed20.........................21.........................22.........................23........................"24    If application is made for a primary election ballot, such 25application shall designate the name of the political party 26with which the applicant is affiliated.  SB2158- 70 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    Such applications may be obtained from the election 2authority having jurisdiction over the person's precinct of 3residence.4    2. A spouse or dependent of a member of the United States 5Service, said spouse or dependent being a registered voter in 6the county, may make application on behalf of said person in 7the office of the election authority within the periods 8prescribed in Section 20-2 which shall be substantially in the 9following form:10"APPLICATION FOR BALLOT to be voted at the........... election 11in the precinct in which is located the residence of the person 12for whom this application is made at.............(insert 13residence address) in the city/village/township of......... 14County of.......... and State of Illinois.15    I certify that the following named person................ 16(insert name of person) is a member of the United States 17Service.18    I state that said person is a citizen of the United States; 19that on (insert date of election) said person shall have 20resided in the State of Illinois and in the election precinct 21for which this application is made for 30 days; that on the 22above date said person shall be the age of 18 years or above; 23that said person is lawfully entitled to vote in such precinct 24at that election; that said person is a member of the United 25States Service, and that in the course of his duties said 26person expects to be absent from his county of residence on the   SB2158- 71 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1date of holding such election, and that said person will have 2no opportunity to vote in person on that day.3    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 4ballots to be voted by said person at such election and said 5person agrees that he shall return said ballot or ballots to 6the election authority postmarked no later than election day, 7for counting no later than during the period for counting 8provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 14th day 9following election day, or shall destroy said ballot or 10ballots.11    I hereby certify that I am the (mother, father, sister, 12brother, husband or wife) of the said elector, and that I am a 13registered voter in the election precinct for which this 14application is made. (Strike all but one that is applicable.)15    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Article 29 16of The Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 17statements set forth in this application are true and correct.18Name of applicant ......................19Residence address ........................20City/village/township........................21    Service address to which ballot should be mailed:22.........................23.........................24.........................25........................"26    If application is made for a primary election ballot, such   SB2158- 72 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1application shall designate the name of the political party 2with which the person for whom application is made is 3affiliated.4    Such applications may be obtained from the election 5authority having jurisdiction over the voting precinct in 6which the person for whom application is made is entitled to 7vote.8(Source: P.A. 101-270, eff. 1-1-21; 102-292, eff. 1-1-22.) 9    (10 ILCS 5/20-4)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-4)10    Sec. 20-4. Immediately upon the receipt of the official 11postcard or an application as provided in Section 20-3 within 12the times heretofore prescribed, the election authority shall 13ascertain whether or not such applicant is legally entitled to 14vote as requested, including verification of the applicant's 15signature by comparison with the signature on the official 16registration record card, if any. If the election authority 17ascertains that the applicant is lawfully entitled to vote, it 18shall enter the name, street address, ward and precinct number 19of such applicant on a list to be posted in his or its office 20in a place accessible to the public. Within one day after 21posting the name and other information of an applicant for a 22ballot, the election authority shall transmit that name and 23posted information to the State Board of Elections, which 24shall maintain the names and other information in an 25electronic format on its website, arranged by county and   SB2158- 73 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1accessible to State and local political committees. As soon as 2the official ballot is prepared the election authority shall 3immediately deliver the same to the applicant in person, by 4mail, by facsimile transmission, or by electronic transmission 5as provided in Section 20-4.5, when applicable, and this 6Article.7    If any such election authority receives a second or 8additional application which it believes is from the same 9person, he or it shall submit it to the chief judge of the 10circuit court or any judge of that court designated by the 11chief judge. If the chief judge or his designate determines 12that the application submitted to him is a second or 13additional one, he shall so notify the election authority who 14shall disregard the second or additional application.15    The election authority shall maintain a list for each 16election of the voters to whom it has issued vote by mail 17ballots. The list shall be maintained for each precinct within 18the jurisdiction of the election authority. Prior to the 19opening of the polls on election day, the election authority 20shall deliver to the judges of election in each precinct the 21list of registered voters in that precinct to whom vote by mail 22ballots have been issued.23    Election authorities may transmit by facsimile or other 24electronic means a ballot simultaneously with transmitting an 25application for vote by mail ballot; however, no such ballot 26shall be counted unless an application has been completed by   SB2158- 74 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the voter and the election authority ascertains that the 2applicant is lawfully entitled to vote as provided in this 3Section. 4(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 5    (10 ILCS 5/20-4.5 new)6    Sec. 20-4.5. Primary ballots.7    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 8entitled to vote by absentee ballot in a primary election 9shall not be required to declare his or her political party 10affiliation and shall be provided with a ballot including all 11candidates for offices, regardless of the party affiliation of 12the candidates, for which the absentee voter is entitled to 13vote in that primary election.14    (b) With respect to the marking, casting, and counting of 15primary ballots, absentee voting shall be conducted in 16accordance with Sections 7-43 and 7-44 and any other 17provisions of this Article.18    (c) When voting absentee at a primary, the voter shall be 19instructed to discard or otherwise destroy any ballot that the 20voter does not intend to cast. A discarded or destroyed ballot 21is not the ballot the voter agreed in the absentee ballot 22application to return to the election authority. 23    (10 ILCS 5/20-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-5)24    Sec. 20-5. The election authority shall fold the ballot or   SB2158- 75 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1ballots in the manner specified by the statute for folding 2ballots prior to their deposit in the ballot box and shall 3enclose such ballot in an envelope unsealed to be furnished by 4it, which envelope shall bear upon the face thereof the name, 5official title and post office address of the election 6authority, and upon the other side of such envelope there 7shall be printed a certification in substantially the 8following form:9"CERTIFICATION10    I state that I am a resident/former resident of the 11....... precinct of the city/village/township of ............, 12(Designation to be made by Election Authority) or of the .... 13ward in the city of ........... (Designation to be made by 14Election Authority) residing at ................ in said 15city/village/township in the county of ........... and State 16of Illinois; that I am a17    1.  (  ) member of the United States Service18    2.  (  ) citizen of the United States temporarily residing 19outside the territorial limits of the United States20    3. ( ) nonresident civilian citizen21and desire to cast the enclosed ballot pursuant to Article 20 22of the Election Code; that I am lawfully entitled to vote in 23such precinct at the ........... election to be held on 24............25    I further state that I marked the enclosed ballot in 26secret.  SB2158- 76 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Article 29 2of the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 3statements set forth in this certification are true and 4correct.5...............(Name)6.....................7(Service Address)8.....................9.....................10....................." 11    If the ballot enclosed is to be voted at a primary 12election, the certification shall designate the name of the 13political party with which the voter is affiliated.14    In addition to the above, the election authority shall 15provide printed slips giving full instructions regarding the 16manner of completing the forms and affidavits for registration 17by mail or the manner of marking and returning the ballot in 18order that the same may be counted, and shall furnish one of 19the printed slips to each of the applicants at the same time 20the registration materials or ballot is delivered to him.21    In addition to the above, if a ballot to be provided to an 22elector pursuant to this Section contains a public question 23described in subsection (b) of Section 28-6 and the territory 24concerning which the question is to be submitted is not 25described on the ballot due to the space limitations of such 26ballot, the election authority shall provide a printed copy of   SB2158- 77 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1a notice of the public question, which shall include a 2description of the territory in the manner required by Section 316-7. The notice shall be furnished to the elector at the same 4time the ballot is delivered to the elector.5    The envelope in which such registration or such ballot is 6mailed to the voter as well as the envelope in which the 7registration materials or the ballot is returned by the voter 8shall have printed across the face thereof two parallel 9horizontal red bars, each one-quarter inch wide, extending 10from one side of the envelope to the other side, with an 11intervening space of one-quarter inch, the top bar to be one 12and one-quarter inches from the top of the envelope, and with 13the words "Official Election Balloting Material-VIA AIR MAIL" 14between the bars. In the upper right corner of such envelope in 15a box, there shall be printed the words: "U.S. Postage Paid 42 16USC 1973". All printing on the face of such envelopes shall be 17in red, including an appropriate inscription or blank in the 18upper left corner of return address of sender.19    The envelope in which the ballot is returned to the 20election authority may be delivered (i) by mail, postage paid, 21(ii) in person, by the spouse, parent, child, brother, or 22sister of the voter, or (iii) by a company engaged in the 23business of making deliveries of property and licensed as a 24motor carrier of property by the Illinois Commerce Commission 25under the Illinois Commercial Transportation Law. 26    Election authorities transmitting ballots by facsimile or   SB2158- 78 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1electronic transmission shall, to the extent possible, provide 2those applicants with the same instructions, certification, 3and other materials required when sending by mail. 4(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.)  5    (10 ILCS 5/20-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-8)6    Sec. 20-8. Time and place of counting ballots.7    (a) (Blank.)8    (b) Each vote by mail voter's ballot returned to an 9election authority, by any means authorized by this Article, 10and received by that election authority may be processed by 11the election authority beginning on the day it is received by 12the election authority in the central ballot counting location 13of the election authority, but the results of the processing 14may not be counted until the day of the election after 7:00 15p.m., except as provided in subsections (g) and (g-5). 16    (c) Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an 17election authority and postmarked no later than election day, 18but that is received by the election authority after the polls 19close on election day and before the close of the period for 20counting provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be 21endorsed by the receiving authority with the day and hour of 22receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot counting 23location of the election authority during the period for 24counting provisional ballots.25    Each vote by mail voter's ballot that is mailed to an   SB2158- 79 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1election authority absent a postmark or a barcode usable with 2an intelligent mail barcode tracking system, but that is 3received by the election authority after the polls close on 4election day and before the close of the period for counting 5provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be endorsed 6by the receiving authority with the day and hour of receipt, 7opened to inspect the date inserted on the certification, and, 8if the certification date is election day or earlier and the 9ballot is otherwise found to be valid under the requirements 10of this Section, counted at the central ballot counting 11location of the election authority during the period for 12counting provisional ballots. Absent a date on the 13certification, the ballot shall not be counted. 14    If an election authority is using an intelligent mail 15barcode tracking system, a ballot that is mailed to an 16election authority absent a postmark may be counted if the 17intelligent mail barcode tracking system verifies the envelope 18was mailed no later than election day. 19    (d) Special write-in vote by mail voter's blank ballots 20returned to an election authority, by any means authorized by 21this Article, and received by the election authority at any 22time before the closing of the polls on election day shall be 23endorsed by the receiving election authority with the day and 24hour of receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot 25counting location of the election authority during the same 26period provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots   SB2158- 80 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1under subsections (b), (g), and (g-5). Special write-in vote 2by mail voter's blank ballot that are mailed to an election 3authority and postmarked no later than election day, but that 4are received by the election authority after the polls close 5on election day and before the closing of the period for 6counting provisional ballots cast at that election, shall be 7endorsed by the receiving authority with the day and hour of 8receipt and shall be counted at the central ballot counting 9location of the election authority during the same periods 10provided for counting vote by mail voters' ballots under 11subsection (c). 12    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, vote by 13mail voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's 14blank ballots received by the election authority after the 15closing of the polls on the day of election shall be endorsed 16by the person receiving the ballots with the day and hour of 17receipt and shall be safely kept unopened by the election 18authority for the period of time required for the preservation 19of ballots used at the election, and shall then, without being 20opened, be destroyed in like manner as the used ballots of that 21election.22    (f) Counting required under this Section to begin on 23election day after the closing of the polls shall commence no 24later than 8:00 p.m. and shall be conducted by a panel or 25panels of election judges appointed in the manner provided by 26law. The counting shall continue until all vote by mail   SB2158- 81 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1voters' ballots and special write-in vote by mail voter's 2blank ballots required to be counted on election day have been 3counted.4    (g) The procedures set forth in Articles 17 and 18 and, 5with respect to primary elections, the procedures set forth in 6Section 20-4.5, of this Code shall apply to all ballots 7counted under this Section. In addition, within 2 days after a 8ballot subject to this Article is received, but in all cases 9before the close of the period for counting provisional 10ballots, the election judge or official shall compare the 11voter's signature on the certification envelope of that ballot 12with the signature of the voter on file in the office of the 13election authority. If the election judge or official 14determines that the 2 signatures match, and that the voter is 15otherwise qualified to cast a ballot under this Article, the 16election authority shall cast and count the ballot on election 17day or the day the ballot is determined to be valid, whichever 18is later, adding the results to the precinct in which the voter 19is registered. If the election judge or official determines 20that the signatures do not match, or that the voter is not 21qualified to cast a ballot under this Article, then without 22opening the certification envelope, the judge or official 23shall mark across the face of the certification envelope the 24word "Rejected" and shall not cast or count the ballot.25    In addition to the voter's signatures not matching, a 26ballot subject to this Article may be rejected by the election   SB2158- 82 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1judge or official:2        (1) if the ballot envelope is open or has been opened 3    and resealed;4        (2) if the voter has already cast an early or grace 5    period ballot;6        (3) if the voter voted in person on election day or the 7    voter is not a duly registered voter in the precinct; or8        (4) on any other basis set forth in this Code.9    If the election judge or official determines that any of 10these reasons apply, the judge or official shall mark across 11the face of the certification envelope the word "Rejected" and 12shall not cast or count the ballot.13    (g-5) If a ballot subject to this Article is rejected by 14the election judge or official for any reason, the election 15authority shall, within 2 days after the rejection but in all 16cases before the close of the period for counting provisional 17ballots, notify the voter that his or her ballot was rejected. 18The notice shall inform the voter of the reason or reasons the 19ballot was rejected and shall state that the voter may appear 20before the election authority, on or before the 14th day after 21the election, to show cause as to why the ballot should not be 22rejected. The voter may present evidence to the election 23authority supporting his or her contention that the ballot 24should be counted. The election authority shall appoint a 25panel of 3 election judges to review the contested ballot, 26application, and certification envelope, as well as any   SB2158- 83 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1evidence submitted by the vote by mail voter. No more than 2 2election judges on the reviewing panel shall be of the same 3political party. The reviewing panel of election judges shall 4make a final determination as to the validity of the contested 5ballot. The judges' determination shall not be reviewable 6either administratively or judicially.7    A ballot subject to this subsection that is determined to 8be valid shall be counted before the close of the period for 9counting provisional ballots.10    (g-10) All ballots determined to be valid shall be added 11to the vote totals for the precincts for which they were cast 12in the order in which the ballots were opened. 13    (h) Each political party, candidate, and qualified civic 14organization shall be entitled to have present one pollwatcher 15for each panel of election judges therein assigned.16(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 17    (10 ILCS 5/24A-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 24A-5)18    Sec. 24A-5. In precincts where an electronic voting system 19is used, a sufficient number of voting booths shall be 20provided for the use of such systems according to the 21requirements determined by the State Board of Elections, and 22the booths shall be arranged in the same manner as provided for 23use with paper ballots. Each such booth shall be placed so that 24the entrance to each booth faces a wall in such a manner that 25no judge of election or pollwatcher is able to observe a voter   SB2158- 84 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1casting a ballot.2    Whenever at a primary election at which an electronic 3voting system is used there is also an election for officers or 4on propositions in which qualified voters have the right to 5vote without participating in the primary of any party, a 6separate voting booth may be provided for those voters who do 7not wish to participate in the primary of any party. Such 8determination shall be made by resolution of the county board, 9municipal board of election commissioners or county board of 10election commissioners, whichever is applicable. Unless paper 11ballots are used for such other election, such separate voting 12booth shall contain a ballot label booklet containing only 13those officers and propositions on which such voters are 14entitled to vote.15(Source: P.A. 84-659.) 16    (10 ILCS 5/24A-6)  (from Ch. 46, par. 24A-6)17    Sec. 24A-6. The ballot information, whether placed on the 18ballot or on the marking device, shall, as far as practicable, 19be in the order of arrangement provided for paper ballots, 20except that such information may be in vertical or horizontal 21rows, or in a number of separate pages. Ballots for all 22questions or propositions to be voted on must be provided in 23the same manner and must be arranged on or in the marking 24device or on the ballot sheet in the places provided for such 25purposes.  SB2158- 85 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    When an electronic voting system utilizes a ballot label 2booklet and ballot card, ballots for candidates, ballots 3calling for a constitutional convention, constitutional 4amendment ballots, judicial retention ballots, public 5measures, and all propositions to be voted upon may be placed 6on the electronic voting device by providing in the ballot 7booklet separate ballot label pages or series of pages 8distinguished by differing colors as provided below. When an 9electronic voting system utilizes a ballot sheet, ballots 10calling for a constitutional convention, constitutional 11amendment ballots and judicial retention ballots shall be 12placed on the ballot sheet by providing a separate portion of 13the ballot sheet for each such kind of ballot which shall be 14printed in ink of a color distinct from the color of ink used 15in printing any other portion of the ballot sheet. Ballots for 16candidates, public measures and all other propositions to be 17voted upon shall be placed on the ballot sheet by providing a 18separate portion of the ballot sheet for each such kind of 19ballot. Whenever a person has submitted a declaration of 20intent to be a write-in candidate as required in Sections 2117-16.1 and 18-9.1, a line on which the name of a candidate may 22be written by the voter shall be printed below the name of the 23last candidate nominated for such office, and immediately to 24the left of such line an area shall be provided for marking a 25vote for such write-in candidate. The number of write-in lines 26for an office shall equal the number of persons who have filed   SB2158- 86 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1declarations of intent to be write-in candidates plus an 2additional line or lines for write-in candidates who qualify 3to file declarations to be write-in candidates under Sections 417-16.1 and 18-9.1 when the certification of ballot contains 5the words "OBJECTION PENDING" next to the name of the 6candidate, up to the number of candidates for which a voter may 7vote. More than one amendment to the constitution may be 8placed on the same ballot page or series of pages or on the 9same portion of the ballot sheet, as the case may be. Ballot 10label pages for constitutional conventions or constitutional 11amendments shall be on paper of blue color and shall precede 12all other ballot label pages in the ballot label booklet. More 13than one public measure or proposition may be placed on the 14same ballot label page or series of pages or on the same 15portion of the ballot sheet, as the case may be. More than one 16proposition for retention of judges in office may be placed on 17the same ballot label page or series of pages or on the same 18portion of the ballot sheet, as the case may be. Ballot label 19pages for candidates shall be on paper of white color, except 20that in primary elections the ballot label page or pages for 21the candidates of each respective political party shall be of 22the color designated by the election official in charge of the 23election for that political party's candidates; provided that 24the ballot label pages or pages for candidates for use at the 25nonpartisan and consolidated elections may be on paper of 26different colors, except blue, whenever necessary or desirable   SB2158- 87 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1to facilitate distinguishing between the pages for different 2political subdivisions. On each page of the candidate booklet, 3where the election is made to list ballot information 4vertically, the party affiliation of each candidate or the 5word "independent" shall appear immediately to the left of the 6candidate's name, and the name of candidates for the same 7office shall be listed vertically under the title of that 8office. If no candidate or candidates file for an office and if 9no person or persons file a declaration as a write-in 10candidate for that office, then below the title of that office 11the election authority instead shall print "No Candidate". In 12the case of nonpartisan elections for officers of political 13subdivisions, unless the statute or an ordinance adopted 14pursuant to Article VII of the Constitution requires 15otherwise, the listing of such nonpartisan candidates shall 16not include any party or "independent" designation. Ballot 17label pages for judicial retention ballots shall be on paper 18of green color, and ballot label pages for all public measures 19and other propositions shall be on paper of some other 20distinct and different color. In primary elections, a separate 21ballot label booklet, marking device and voting booth shall be 22used for each political party holding a primary, with the 23ballot label booklet arranged to include ballot label pages of 24the candidates of the party and public measures and other 25propositions to be voted upon on the day of the primary 26election. One ballot card may be used for recording the   SB2158- 88 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1voter's vote or choice on all such ballots, proposals, public 2measures or propositions, and such ballot card shall be 3arranged so as to record the voter's vote or choice in a 4separate column or columns for each such kind of ballot, 5proposal, public measure or proposition.6    If the ballot label booklet includes both candidates for 7office and public measures or propositions to be voted on, the 8election official in charge of the election shall divide the 9pages by protruding tabs identifying the division of the 10pages, and printing on such tabs "Candidates" and 11"Propositions".12    The ballot card and all of its columns and the ballot card 13envelope shall be of the color prescribed for candidate's 14ballots at the general or primary election, whichever is being 15held. At an election where no candidates are being nominated 16or elected, the ballot card, its columns, and the ballot card 17envelope shall be of a color designated by the election 18official in charge of the election.19    The ballot cards, ballot card envelopes and ballot sheets 20may, at the discretion of the election authority, be printed 21on white paper and then striped with the appropriate colors.22    When ballot sheets are used, the various portions thereof 23shall be arranged to conform to the foregoing format.24    Vote by mail ballots may consist of ballot cards, 25envelopes, paper ballots, or ballot sheets. Where a ballot 26card is used for voting by mail it must be accompanied by a   SB2158- 89 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1punching tool or other appropriate marking device, voter 2instructions and a specimen ballot showing the proper 3positions to vote on the ballot card or ballot sheet for each 4party, candidate, proposal, public measure or proposition, and 5in the case of a ballot card must be mounted on a suitable 6material to receive the punched out chip.7    Any voter who spoils his ballot or makes an error may 8return the ballot to the judges of election and secure 9another. However, the protruding identifying tab for proposals 10for a constitutional convention or constitutional amendments 11shall have printed thereon "Constitutional Ballot", and the 12ballot label page or pages for such proposals shall precede 13the ballot label pages for candidates in the ballot label 14booklet.15(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 16    (10 ILCS 5/24B-6)17    Sec. 24B-6. Ballot Information; Arrangement; Electronic 18Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan Technology Voting System; 19Vote by Mail Ballots; Spoiled Ballots. The ballot 20information, shall, as far as practicable, be in the order of 21arrangement provided for paper ballots, except that the 22information may be in vertical or horizontal rows, or on a 23number of separate pages or displays on the marking device. 24Ballots for all questions or propositions to be voted on 25should be provided in a similar manner and must be arranged on   SB2158- 90 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the ballot sheet or marking device in the places provided for 2such purposes. Ballots shall be of white paper unless provided 3otherwise by administrative rule of the State Board of 4Elections or otherwise specified.5    All propositions, including but not limited to 6propositions calling for a constitutional convention, 7constitutional amendment, judicial retention, and public 8measures to be voted upon shall be placed on separate portions 9of the ballot sheet or marking device by utilizing borders or 10grey screens. Candidates shall be listed on a separate portion 11of the ballot sheet or marking device by utilizing borders or 12grey screens. Whenever a person has submitted a declaration of 13intent to be a write-in candidate as required in Sections 1417-16.1 and 18-9.1, a line or lines on which the voter may 15select a write-in candidate shall be printed below the name of 16the last candidate nominated for such office. Such line or 17lines shall be proximate to an area provided for marking votes 18for the write-in candidate or candidates. The number of 19write-in lines for an office shall equal the number of persons 20who have filed declarations of intent to be write-in 21candidates plus an additional line or lines for write-in 22candidates who qualify to file declarations to be write-in 23candidates under Sections 17-16.1 and 18-9.1 when the 24certification of ballot contains the words "OBJECTION PENDING" 25next to the name of that candidate, up to the number of 26candidates for which a voter may vote. In the case of write-in   SB2158- 91 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1lines for the offices of Governor and Lieutenant Governor, 2 2lines shall be printed within a bracket and a single square 3shall be printed in front of the bracket. More than one 4amendment to the constitution may be placed on the same 5portion of the ballot sheet or marking device. Constitutional 6convention or constitutional amendment propositions shall be 7printed or displayed on a separate portion of the ballot sheet 8or marking device and designated by borders or grey screens, 9unless otherwise provided by administrative rule of the State 10Board of Elections. More than one public measure or 11proposition may be placed on the same portion of the ballot 12sheet or marking device. More than one proposition for 13retention of judges in office may be placed on the same portion 14of the ballot sheet or marking device. Names of candidates 15shall be printed in black. The party affiliation of each 16candidate or the word "independent" shall appear near or under 17the candidate's name, and the names of candidates for the same 18office shall be listed vertically under the title of that 19office, on separate pages of the marking device, or as 20otherwise approved by the State Board of Elections. If no 21candidate or candidates file for an office and if no person or 22persons file a declaration as a write-in candidate for that 23office, then below the title of that office the election 24authority instead shall print "No Candidate". In the case of 25nonpartisan elections for officers of political subdivisions, 26unless the statute or an ordinance adopted pursuant to Article   SB2158- 92 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1VII of the Constitution requires otherwise, the listing of 2nonpartisan candidates shall not include any party or 3"independent" designation. Judicial retention questions and 4ballot questions for all public measures and other 5propositions shall be designated by borders or grey screens on 6the ballot or marking device. In primary elections, a separate 7ballot, or displays on the marking device, shall be used for 8each political party holding a primary, with the ballot or 9marking device arranged to include names of the candidates of 10the party and public measures and other propositions to be 11voted upon on the day of the primary election.12    If the ballot includes both candidates for office and 13public measures or propositions to be voted on, the election 14official in charge of the election shall divide the ballot or 15displays on the marking device in sections for "Candidates" 16and "Propositions", or separate ballots may be used.17    Vote by Mail ballots may consist of envelopes, paper 18ballots, or ballot sheets. Where a Precinct Tabulation Optical 19Scan Technology ballot is used for voting by mail it must be 20accompanied by voter instructions.21    Any voter who spoils his or her ballot, makes an error, or 22has a ballot returned by the automatic tabulating equipment 23may return the ballot to the judges of election and get another 24ballot.25(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.)   SB2158- 93 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    (10 ILCS 5/24C-6)2    Sec. 24C-6. Ballot Information; Arrangement; Direct 3Recording Electronic Voting System; Vote by Mail Ballots; 4Spoiled Ballots. The ballot information, shall, as far as 5practicable, be in the order of arrangement provided for paper 6ballots, except that the information may be in vertical or 7horizontal rows, or on a number of separate pages or display 8screens.9    Ballots for all public questions to be voted on should be 10provided in a similar manner and must be arranged on the ballot 11in the places provided for such purposes. All public 12questions, including but not limited to public questions 13calling for a constitutional convention, constitutional 14amendment, or judicial retention, shall be placed on the 15ballot separate and apart from candidates. Ballots for all 16public questions shall be clearly designated by borders or 17different color screens. More than one amendment to the 18constitution may be placed on the same portion of the ballot 19sheet. Constitutional convention or constitutional amendment 20propositions shall be placed on a separate portion of the 21ballot and designated by borders or unique color screens, 22unless otherwise provided by administrative rule of the State 23Board of Elections. More than one public question may be 24placed on the same portion of the ballot. More than one 25proposition for retention of judges in office may be placed on 26the same portion of the ballot.  SB2158- 94 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    The party affiliation, if any, of each candidate or the 2word "independent", where applicable, shall appear near or 3under the candidate's name, and the names of candidates for 4the same office shall be listed vertically under the title of 5that office. In the case of nonpartisan elections for officers 6of political subdivisions, unless the statute or an ordinance 7adopted pursuant to Article VII of the Constitution requires 8otherwise, the listing of nonpartisan candidates shall not 9include any party or "independent" designation. If no 10candidate or candidates file for an office and if no person or 11persons file a declaration as a write-in candidate for that 12office, then below the title of that office the election 13authority shall print "No Candidate". In primary elections, a 14separate ballot shall be used for each political party holding 15a primary, with the ballot arranged to include names of the 16candidates of the party and public questions and other 17propositions to be voted upon on the day of the primary 18election.19    If the ballot includes both candidates for office and 20public questions or propositions to be voted on, the election 21official in charge of the election shall divide the ballot in 22sections for "Candidates" and "Public Questions", or separate 23ballots may be used.24    Any voter who spoils his or her ballot, makes an error, or 25has a ballot rejected by the automatic tabulating equipment 26shall be provided a means of correcting the ballot or   SB2158- 95 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1obtaining a new ballot prior to casting his or her ballot.2    Any election authority using a Direct Recording Electronic 3Voting System may use voting systems approved for use under 4Articles 24A or 24B of this Code in conducting vote by mail or 5early voting.6(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 7    (10 ILCS 5/24C-11)8    Sec. 24C-11. Functional requirements. A Direct Recording 9Electronic Voting System shall, in addition to satisfying the 10other requirements of this Article, fulfill the following 11functional requirements:12    (a) Provide a voter in a primary election with the means of 13casting a ballot containing votes for any and all candidates 14of the party or parties of his or her choice, and for any and 15all non-partisan candidates and public questions and preclude 16the voter from voting for any candidate of any other political 17party except when legally permitted. In a general election, 18the system shall provide the voter with means of selecting the 19appropriate number of candidates for any office, and of voting 20on any public question on the ballot to which he or she is 21entitled to vote.22    (b) If a voter is not entitled to vote for particular 23candidates or public questions appearing on the ballot, the 24system shall prevent the selection of the prohibited votes.25    (c) Once the proper ballot has been selected, the system   SB2158- 96 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1devices shall provide a means of enabling the recording of 2votes and the casting of said ballot.3    (d) System voting devices shall provide voting choices 4that are clear to the voter and labels indicating the names of 5every candidate and the text of every public question on the 6voter's ballot. Each label shall identify the selection button 7or switch, or the active area of the ballot associated with it. 8The system shall be able to incorporate minimal, 9easy-to-follow on-screen instruction for the voter on how to 10cast a ballot.11    (e) Voting devices shall (i) enable the voter to vote for 12any and all candidates and public questions appearing on the 13ballot for which the voter is lawfully entitled to vote, in any 14legal number and combination; (ii) detect and reject all votes 15for an office or upon a public question when the voter has cast 16more votes for the office or upon the public question than the 17voter is entitled to cast; (iii) notify the voter if the 18voter's choices as recorded on the ballot for an office or 19public question are fewer than or exceed the number that the 20voter is entitled to vote for on that office or public question 21and the effect of casting more or fewer votes than legally 22permitted; (iv) notify the voter if the voter has failed to 23completely cast a vote for an office or public question 24appearing on the ballot; and (v) permit the voter, in a private 25and independent manner, to verify the votes selected by the 26voter, to change the ballot or to correct any error on the   SB2158- 97 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1ballot before the ballot is completely cast and counted. A 2means shall be provided to indicate each selection after it 3has been made or canceled.4    (f) System voting devices shall provide a means for the 5voter to signify that the selection of candidates and public 6questions has been completed. Upon activation, the system 7shall record an image of the completed ballot, increment the 8proper ballot position registers, and shall signify to the 9voter that the ballot has been cast. The system shall then 10prevent any further attempt to vote until it has been reset or 11re-enabled by a judge of election.12    (g) Each system voting device shall be equipped with a 13public counter that can be set to zero prior to the opening of 14the polling place, and that records the number of ballots cast 15at a particular election. The counter shall be incremented 16only by the casting of a ballot. The counter shall be designed 17to prevent disabling or resetting by other than authorized 18persons after the polls close. The counter shall be visible to 19all judges of election so long as the device is installed at 20the polling place.21    (h) Each system voting device shall be equipped with a 22protective counter that records all of the testing and 23election ballots cast since the unit was built. This counter 24shall be designed so that its reading cannot be changed by any 25cause other than the casting of a ballot. The protective 26counter shall be incapable of ever being reset and it shall be   SB2158- 98 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1visible at all times when the device is configured for 2testing, maintenance, or election use.3    (i) All system devices shall provide a means of preventing 4further voting once the polling place has closed and after all 5eligible voters have voted. Such means of control shall 6incorporate a visible indication of system status. Each device 7shall prevent any unauthorized use, prevent tampering with 8ballot labels and preclude its re-opening once the poll 9closing has been completed for that election.10    (j) The system shall produce a printed summary report of 11the votes cast upon each voting device. Until the proper 12sequence of events associated with closing the polling place 13has been completed, the system shall not allow the printing of 14a report or the extraction of data. The printed report shall 15also contain all system audit information to be required by 16the election authority. Data shall not be altered or otherwise 17destroyed by report generation and the system shall ensure the 18integrity and security of data for a period of at least 6 19months after the polls close.20    (k) If more than one voting device is used in a polling 21place, the system shall provide a means to manually or 22electronically consolidate the data from all such units into a 23single report even if different voting systems are used to 24record ballots. The system shall also be capable of merging 25the vote tabulation results produced by other vote tabulation 26systems, if necessary.  SB2158- 99 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1    (l) System functions shall be implemented such that 2unauthorized access to them is prevented and the execution of 3authorized functions in an improper sequence is precluded. 4System functions shall be executable only in the intended 5manner and order, and only under the intended conditions. If 6the preconditions to a system function have not been met, the 7function shall be precluded from executing by the system's 8control logic.9    (m) All system voting devices shall incorporate at least 3 10memories in the machine itself and in its programmable memory 11devices.12    (n) The system shall include capabilities of recording and 13reporting the date and time of normal and abnormal events and 14of maintaining a permanent record of audit information that 15cannot be turned off. Provisions shall be made to detect and 16record significant events (e.g., casting a ballot, error 17conditions that cannot be disposed of by the system itself, 18time-dependent or programmed events that occur without the 19intervention of the voter or a judge of election).20    (o) The system and each system voting device must be 21capable of creating, printing and maintaining a permanent 22paper record and an electronic image of each ballot that is 23cast such that records of individual ballots are maintained by 24a subsystem independent and distinct from the main vote 25detection, interpretation, processing and reporting path. The 26electronic images of each ballot must protect the integrity of   SB2158- 100 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1the data and the anonymity of each voter, for example, by means 2of storage location scrambling. The ballot image records may 3be either machine-readable or manually transcribed, or both, 4at the discretion of the election authority.5    (p) The system shall include built-in test, measurement 6and diagnostic software and hardware for detecting and 7reporting the system's status and degree of operability.8    (q) The system shall contain provisions for maintaining 9the integrity of memory voting and audit data during an 10election and for a period of at least 6 months thereafter and 11shall provide the means for creating an audit trail.12    (r) The system shall be fully accessible so as to permit 13blind or visually impaired voters as well as voters with 14physical disabilities to exercise their right to vote in 15private and without assistance.16    (s) The system shall provide alternative language 17accessibility if required pursuant to Section 203 of the 18Voting Rights Act of 1965.19    (t) Each voting device shall enable a voter to vote for a 20person whose name does not appear on the ballot.21    (u) The system shall record and count accurately each vote 22properly cast for or against any candidate and for or against 23any public question, including the names of all candidates 24whose names are written in by the voters.25    (v) The system shall allow for accepting provisional 26ballots and for separating such provisional ballots from   SB2158- 101 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1precinct totals until authorized by the election authority.2    (w) The system shall provide an effective audit trail as 3defined in Section 24C-2 in this Code.4    (x) The system shall be suitably designed for the purpose 5used, be durably constructed, and be designed for safety, 6accuracy and efficiency.7    (y) The system shall comply with all provisions of 8federal, State and local election laws and regulations and any 9future modifications to those laws and regulations.10(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 11    (10 ILCS 5/25-10)  (from Ch. 46, par. 25-10)12    Sec. 25-10. This Section applies only to counties of 133,000,000 or more population. When a vacancy occurs in the 14office of Clerk of the Circuit Court of any of the counties in 15this State, it shall be the duty of the Circuit Judges of the 16respective judicial circuit in which such vacancy may occur, 17to make an appointment to fill the vacancy for the remainder of 18the unexpired term. However, if more than 28 months remain in 19the term, the appointment shall be until the next general 20election, at which time a clerk of the circuit court shall be 21elected for the balance of the unexpired term. The appointee 22shall be a member of the same political party as the person he 23succeeds was at the time of his election and shall be otherwise 24eligible to serve as Clerk of the Circuit Court. The Circuit 25Judges may appoint a Clerk Pro Tempore for whatever period is   SB2158- 102 -LRB104 10882 SPS 20964 b1necessary while reviewing the qualifications of candidates for 2appointment to the office.3(Source: P.A. 90-672, eff. 7-31-98.) 4    (10 ILCS 5/Art. 10 rep.)5    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by repealing 6Article 10.